Make cheese sauce first, in a medium size pot, melt butter. When butter is melted, add whole wheat flour and whisk until all of the flour is wet. Continue to whisk to cook the flour a bit. Add milk a little bit at a time. Start with just a splash and whisk lumps away. Add a little bit more and keep whisking keeping lumps away. Add sea salt and pepper to taste. Add cheese and continue to whisk until sauce has thickened and cheese melts. Set aside, keeping warm.
The people in these occult groups have grown up in a culture of total abuse. It is abuse on a level you cannot even imagine. If a regular adult ran through a typical “training session” they would literally die of a heart attack or stroke from fear.
“H-hi _-___ . . ” he managed to get out. Over the phone, it sounded like he was sniffling.
Play some lively, fun, upbeat music. Dance your way through your home or office with your dust rag or vacuum.
I thought you knew where
If they actually do less buying and selling, they will be better off. If they had even an average investment and held it for that 20 year period they would beat 99% of all their friends and neighbours who averaged 3.83%
Perhaps it's inevitable - before you choose the words, characters, plot twists and so on, the image of the book you hold in your head has the advantages conferred by all choices. Then when you shut off some choices, you lose their potential benefits.
Him: "Oh...I mean boo..go orange..are they winning? I'll cheer for them if they're winning"
QR codes themselves I can take or leave. There seems to be some springtime of love in London for these curious 1990s Japanese throwbacks: everyone has them on their printed ephemera and posters. In the ‘looking cool’ stakes, they’ll soon be so over-used that by summer they’ll either look tacky or be invisible. Functionally: I recall Mia Ridge saying something about simple, quick paths to information, and if you have a smartphone (and a signal – no in-house wifi at the Grant) they do work as a simple trigger to open a webpage or application.
P.S - I have just come back and discovered this new look blog, its taken me forever to do my post today, cant understand how the stupid thing works!! Its taken forever to do my post today!
Concerning Character: Tristan Hart is ...Just This Guy. He's just this guy whom everyone likes, he's just this guy who is a lifeguard, he's just this guy who is... eye candy, essentially, at Coney Island. And, he knows it..
If I can be said to strongly identify as anything, it is as a smart person. I have identified as a smart person for the majority of my life, and it is something that I take pride in, however foolishly. I think that some of my experiences in the gifted program in my schooling lead me to believe that being intelligent and being creative were separate, mutually exclusive things.
It is with a silly, giddy grin and a great sense of pride that I announce the completion of my video experiment! What started as mere doodling and a bit of curiosity evolved into a wondrous project that occupied both my mind and my free time for the past few months.
That the longer we've kept 'em, the more do we grieve:
A Christmas Story (1983) ... TCM ... 9 PM
Just say tenes!
eyesore out back and scoped out several boards that I thought would work. Then DH
I think that we, if God is who I think He is, will be shocked by what He thinks is important. He is merciful and full of grace, because we are all in great need of both. He is not as small as men, preachers and fear-mongers threaten us with. He does not exist in our image. He is not punitive.
Well, folks, there you have it. Two heart-warming tales of cannibalistic dumbassery. Have a merry Christmas.
One hour before baking the pizza, adjust an oven rack to the second highest position and place a baking stone on the rack to preheat. Preheat the oven to 500˚ F. Remove the pizza dough from the refrigerator and divide in half. (If you plan to freeze a portion of the dough, this is the time to wrap in plastic, place in a freezer bag and freeze for later use.) Form each half into a ball and place on a lightly oiled baking sheet. Spray the dough balls lightly with cooking spray. Cover loosely with plastic wrap and let sit at room temperature for 1 hour.
Well said. Thanks to Goldberg for this public service! The fact that this question still even looms in the thinking of intelligent people boggles the mind
3. WHO ARE SOME OF YOUR MUSICAL INFLUENCES?
“He has instructed the authorities to bring 20 excavators so that the dead bodies of those who have been buried by the floods can be recovered,” Bishwadeep Pandey, personal secretary to the premier, told AFP.
Ross's target is an amazing £3,500.00. From helping us run our centres which care for around 16,000 dogs a year to enabling us to carry out neutering, microchipping and education campaigns, this could really go a long way, so please consider supporting Ross's efforts.
“Entire timelines will change,” I said.
VIDAL: He was convicted for violating Cuban laws, attempting against
*note: I do not make my boys strip every time we do a family activity. This occurs naturally. And. It still does not stop them from managing to get whatever medium they are working with all over their clothes anyway. Strange phenomenon. * **Also to note: Ethan did participate in this activity. He just hurried and finished before I had a chance to break out the camera.**
And certainly the only 28-year-old willing to admit it.
But of course that’s looking at the question backwards.
Although there were four main separate military forces in action during those times namely, the South African Defence Force (SADF), Airforce, Navy and the Police, I will only give a brief account of the SADF’s involvement.
To save your bold anywhere on the map screen, exhausted the final alcazar in Apple 8. If you restart, you will accept a brilliant next to your save and you’ll get the “Save” advantage added to your agenda in the map screen.
Two Week Ago Winner of 5 Page Critique is JBW0123.
Of late, I notice that various salted egg dishes have surfaced on the menu of restaurants and eateries. Most popular of all is the salted egg with crabs with both the wet and dry versions. I've also recently tasted salted egg with pumpkin and salted egg with beancurd and lately some bloggers have posted fried rice with salted egg. I have recently coined this dish ....... 'Salted egg steamed Chicken' and would like to share it with you.
PETER DELUISE (Rescue Me)
Free of repression and doubt
As always, we appreciate the opportunity to earn your business!
And I was assigned to him for a week.
If somehow you haven’t heard
His latest “outreach”:
I hit upon a crochet bowl ( like the one in my side bar ) and dug out my assorted cotton yarns. I was looking for the right colours when I spotted a little forgotten W.I.P. in the bottom of the bag, some pretty stripes....
This picture is a fun application Walt Disney World has on Facebook. At least that's where I found it, but they might have it on their website also. You can design your family members, either in regular clothes or Disney character costumes. Of course, Neil and I both had to have cameras. Rick and Nathan seemed best off with ice cream bars. My ILs used to live in Hawaii, so the shirts and flowers suited them well. Pretty cute stuff.
London, Björk's new home, was crucial. Jungle had exploded from the underground, and
The Brooklyn football Dodgers remained in the NFL until the 1944 season.
Prof Pilsner
Oh baby oh bye-bye
Yona Williams
Or my fave:
No matter how much experience you have you are bound to pick up a few new neat tricks. And the refreshers on the basics are always valuable. This book will be especially handy to keep near by when you need a quick reference to the correct camera settings to get that perfect shot."
I sit in the parking lot of the school and wait for him to come out. I know the period has ended because students begin streaming out the doors and cross the parking lot in front of me.
In some withdrawn, unpublic mead
I really enjoy myself every year and next Saturday, I’m planning to go to the Grand Palais for the Odilon Redon exhibition and for Monumenta 2011 (with guest Anish Kapoor). And if I have some time left, I’ll go to the Musée du Luxembourg, where I’ve never been before, for the “Cranach and his time” exhibition.
But I just have to have a Shamrock Shake every March!
NBA basketball can be a great sport if some changes are made. If they don’t improve the game, I’m afraid that they might lose some fans to other sports.
One of the first skills you will need to acquire is how to tell the deals from the scams. If the deal sounds way too good to be true, then most likely it is not real. Read the offer carefully. Some of the offers have requirements, and they are pretty simple to do. Others make you jump through hoops, and walk a tightrope and then they enter you into a drawing. That is fine, if you realize ahead of time that you are in a contest and you might not be the winner.
So while this story is interesting in that it speaks to a lack of transparency on a key transition issue (i.e., are the guys we’re trying to help shooting at us more than we realize?), it is in line with usual ISAF numbers reporting.
Of a cool cloth on the forehead -
TRIP TO AUSTRALIA: Literally every single person I graduated high school with went to Australia at some point over the last ten years. I don’t know what drew them there, other than the fact that it’s just upside down Canada.
From the ashes into the fire? Hopefully not, even though equities are trading at extreme lows in nominal terms. Now, if you read Bloomberg, or pretty much any normal basic assessment by a stock analyst, things look pretty grim if you’re looking at 24 P/E for an index, as is the case for the Nikkei 225 at the moment. 5 000 before 25 000, much less 50 000, clear as day, right?
There is much that can be said against Nietzsche’s reasoning here, but by far the most devastating is the fact that a woman’s control over her reproductive rights is a relatively recent phenomenon in human history (so recent that it still hasn’t permeated to many sects of the human population). While the case can be made that historically (both in modern times and in antiquity) men have shown an abstract, philosophical reverence for the feminine form (for her ability to create life), this abstract idealization has very rarely gone far beyond a sparse collection of poetic musings. In practice, women, and their reproductive capabilities, have historically been subject to the control and regulation of their male counterparts (mostly husbands, or other male relatives), for various reasons that range from basic chauvinism, to the outright superstitious. This is a fact that Nietzsche fails to address in his above philosophizing about “women” and their “idealized elevation by men”, despite it being an indispensable part in any thorough narrative about femininity (and history thereof). I cannot personally see how to reconcile this fact with the picture Nietzsche has presented thus far, and I refuse to hypothesize on how the philosopher could have possibly countered the objection, for fear of infusing undue thoughts into the man’s philosophy.
God only knows when and who and how and why that will be. But I’m comfortable with that too.
Then I went to lunch with a friend who doesn't have a (water) horse in this race. She voted for the boy too.
On the one hand, I understand the disdain for emotional manipulation. No one wants to feel that their emotions have been played. But then, isn’t that what writing is supposed to do? Play with your emotions? Draw you in? Make you “feel”? If you feel when you otherwise wouldn’t have felt — isn’t that the point?
With this in mind I think Carucci considers the consent of her subjects, not in the sense that she necessarily asks to take an image but that she doesn’t force the camera upon them. However in family photography it could be said that consent is expected and that it is willingly given. Carucci’s personal work shows relationships between parents, lovers and children. Her photographs are very real and the viewer can see the true closeness she shares with her family and loved ones.
The volunteers who dedicate their time and energy to make NPN the outstanding resource it is also spend countless hours informing and inspiring others on their personal blogs. To close out 2011, the NPN volunteers have come together to provide you with some valuable reading material. Each volunteer has selected either their most viewed post of 2011 or their favorite post and shared the link here. Please take a few moments to visit each post.
Black on white violence is far more the norm than the opposite, and yes, we white people are generally afraid of black people we don't know because of the latter's history of crime and violence. Just read any local news stories on a daily basis. Blacks are continually assaulting themselves and everyone else -- I don't think I am being either unfair or inaccurate on this point. If there is a solution, it is this: the disproportionate crime and violence of the black population must cease. How that is to be accomplished, I do not know. Perhaps the situation can never be improved, I don't really know.
12. Do you eat fast food?
So in the end I had 14 hours of travel for 3 hours at the Salon, was it worth it? Definitely, as I got to pick up the medal in person, and got the chance to meet so many great photographers especially Michelle, Matthew and Gerry, to whom I must give my thanks for making my short time at the Salon exhibition so enjoyable and allowing me to display their well deserved medal-winning images.
Oh live…
I love that he keeps his private life private, supports many excellent charities quietly without making a huge deal of it, is a talented photographer and just an all round nice person as well as being an incredible rock singer.
are acting as host plants to these critters.
Now left on our travels. We are hoping to go up the east coast to John O’Groats then along and down the west coast.
Last Saturday afternoon, I saw a Northern Broadsides production at The New Vic Theatre , Newcastle-under-Lyme...in The Potteries...land of Arnold Bennett.... and all those towns, whose names I learned for geography O level... and strangely, have never forgotten........
The whole room cracked up laughing as Miss Judy said, “you’re right! That’s because that’s NOT JJ!!!”
Teddy’s late wife, Dolores, was initially shown as the female victim, who put up with Teddy’s alcoholism and died in their apartment building’s fire at the hands of Andrew Laeddis. Because Teddy cannot forget about his wife, she is the hindrance that is keeping him on Shutter Island-his anger at her death makes him want to avenge her. Dolores’ appearance in George Noyce’s cell during his conversation with Teddy makes Dolores seem a bit like a femme fatale–she keeps distracting Teddy as Noyce repeatedly tells Teddy he has to let her go. However, by the end of the film, we discover that Dolores is the one who drowned her children, not Rachel Solando, so even Dolores is a psychopath.
Todd Anderson would be played by Jesse Eisenberg.
9.wake the dead
I'm grumpy today because I have lost out on $25 worth of paper pads that I ordered from a company online. They basically told me I was out of luck, sucks to be you. It kind of makes me reluctant to order much more online. Guess I won't be ordering from there again!
Snack: protein bar and grande skinny latte (1 la lite, 1 dairy)
PHIL PRINGLE
**EDIT** I found this cute curtains at Lowes on clearance for $7.50 each today and couldn't resist. The butterfly curtain rod was also on clearance for $13.99. It turned out SO CUTE! Here is an updated picture. And just pretend you don't see the stains on the rug.
You may enter as many times as you like. But, in the interest of fairness, we will remove any entries that do not follow our simple guidelines and/or those entries shall not be eligible for prizes.
At just 21-years-old, Wu has captured the attention of some of the most respected people in the Canadian fashion industry and has been critiqued by the media to the point where he’s dealing with anxiety on a daily basis.
Page 2 of the newspaper has a small item concerning the Minister of Defense, Daniel Mora, cancelling a bid (or tender or contract) that would have been, in the paper’s eyes, beneficial to the State.
well, in lieu of my blog’s first birthday (YAY!)–an adventure i started not exactly knowing where it would go or who i’d meet along the way–i’ve decided i’d like to take it more seriously, for myself and all you lovely & supportive readers and blogging gurus out there.
The sun rises, alongside hope at Aiming-for-Tranquility Computer Village. You nuke your cold coffee and return to sipping, as your brain re-calibrates its thought process for another post.
Does this make me despicable? Honestly, what are your thoughts?
If you have never played a Squier, you might be pleasantly surprised. Costs are low because these guitars are made in Indonesia, but Leo Fender was a good designer. His guitars are simple, robust and elegant, by design. It’s very hard to make a bad one, to his design. Ergo, most guitars made in this design pattern are actually pretty good. The Squier Vintage Modified Jazz Bass Fretless is no exception. It’s a lovely instrument and a delight to play. Sonically, it’s exactly what the doctor ordered.
Aside from having difficulties finding where to purchase this (I got mine from ASOS) I had a bit of trouble knowing which shade would work for me. I typically fall into the second lightest shade or NW20, so I took a chance on #52 Vanilla hoping it would be a useable shade. Luckily the shade turns out to be spot on. I'm not sure if the shades available are as limited everywhere- I tried to check the Bourjois UK site, but my anti-virus keeps registering a threat so I haven't been able to check. If the shades are as limited as it seems, this might be out of the question for darker skinned gals, which is a total shame.
Body:
As I sat there
I will say that I am glad it's a Sunday because I have this feeling that people at work are more into playing pranks.
To have someone else acknowledge not only that things have been bad (because everyone in my life acknowledges that) but to also recognize that all of that bad has affected ME in a very real way... that was helpful.
hushed audible ephifanies
You get a better perspective of how they are going to use the vehicle.
Kudos to Elizabeth Banks for nailing Effie. She showed up for work everyday. People actually laughed at some of the shit she said which was great because her character made it onto the screen. There’s no excuse for this not being more widespread, the author helped write the film and the cast had good actors. So, good work Elizabeth Banks. In this and in 40 Year Old Virgin.
At these times, apart from learning how to deal with such situations and amazing personalities I often asked help from Allah (s.w.t).. often waking up at nights and praying to Allah (s.w.t) to make me strong enough to bear these people.. and i still remember, on a similar tiring day on my way back home from college, listening to the Holy Quran, I came across a verse that left me all startled and gave me goosebumps. At this point, I realized Allah(s.w.t) was actually talking to me and helping me fight with these little nudging worries of my brain at the same time. The verses were as follows..
And all this was aggravated by all the free time I now had on my hands. Yes, I was looking for a job, but it was slow going. Though lots of folks had taken up studying Japanese, what with Japan having become America’s latest economic bogeyman during the 1980s, there still didn’t appear to be a huge demand for Japanese language ability. Oh, people told me there was, but the job listings by and large indicated otherwise.
Middle Tier: White Almond Sour Cream Cake with Chocolate Peanut Butter Buttercream
Used for grooming, dental combs might look menacing to some but their function is less sinister than one might conjure up. A bite from a slow loris is painful due to their sharp pointed teeth. Illustration of slow loris teeth from Loris Conservation. The dental comb is on the lower jaw, shape like a spade.
“Oh come on.”
The day started with Trey giving Xavier his new little car. He just couldn't wait anymore for Xavier to open his present!
Oh and I want to enter this is in the following challenge:
As I turned to look at him, he pressed his lips against mine. I stood there motionless, still in shock. He broke off and looked at me.
Please vote by making your choice below or suggest a name yourself in the box provided - thank you
50. Cna yuo raed tihs? I cdnuolt blveiee taht I cluod aulaclty uesdnatnrd waht I was rdanieg. The phaonmneal pweor of the hmuan mnid, aoccdrnig to a rscheearch at Cmabrigde Uinervtisy, it dseno’t mtaetr in waht oerdr the ltteres in a wrod are, the olny iproamtnt tihng is taht the frsit and lsat ltteer be in the rghit pclae. The rset can be a taotl mses and you can sitll raed it whotuit a pboerlm. Tihs is bcuseae the huamn mnid deos not raed ervey lteter by istlef, but the wrod as a wlohe. Azanmig huh? yaeh and I awlyas tghuhot slpeling was ipmorantt! if you can raed tihs forwrad it
I loiter round my cresses;
Author, books about Christian vegetarianism
The next time, I am just going to go straight to the bakery counter and buy one fresh doughnut.
There will however always be people who can’t work in the traditional sense, either because of ill health or the need to care for someone, or due to maternity leave for example. Society should be able to protect them as much as the people doing the most work on average per week. People should no longer be at the fringes of society because they cannot provide for themselves, weather for a short period or for their rest of their lives. We can however create and provide activities that benefit the community and keep them included in society such as, gardening, child minding, support groups, teaching and art, all whilst providing them with the support they need to function.
Absolutely — just schedule your backup during Night Rider time.
Here’s another bit of Rimbaud in this vein of thought:
I have been decorating our flat, the two bedrooms are now a newer looking shade of magnolia with bright, shiny, white woodwork making them lovely, clean and new. I have also been doing some sewing and made a wonderful (almost anyway) purse and am at the present time undoing some stitching on another one. I will continue un-stitching before re-stitching it correctly and then will show you what I have been making!
Bella giggled. “That is not—his name.”
As the world embraces technology, some of the world’s population is still trying to catch up. While there’s plenty of elderly out there that take to the advancements of our phones, computers, and even our eyes, there’s just as many out there that find the whole situation far too complex for every day usage. Thanks to the Kompott Robotic Agent, students are bridging the gap between connectivity, technology, and the generation gap.
But down I went anyway in the subsequent months.
I told you all this because I believe situations of this nature happen to young ladies more often than we think. We do not realize the potential danger we are in when we roam stores and other public places alone or with a small group of other young ladies. Am I saying that we should never shop or take walks alone? Not necessarily, but I do believe that whenever possible we should have a "body guard" (a.k.a., dad, brother, or husband =) accompany us, or another lady, at least.
I boycotted it hard. When other talked about it non-stop, I refused to let my curiosity get the better of me.
4. God Gave Rock And Roll To You (Ballard) 7:03
And icing smothered on top is a MUST. My mom use to heavily ice the entire thing so no bread was showing and if you landed the icing edge, it was like winning the lottery. :) A lighter glazed icing on top like this was less rich which enabled you to eat more. :) It was perfect!
into this soft willingness. The wind-flowers have come
4 Good Reasons to Get the Asus Eee PC 1005HA 10.1 Inch Netbook
No? Well, you should, really, this should be a goal: to feel better at the end of a meal if not down right happy.
& I still miss him…kinda…I said it.
Tickets for the beerfest are available online or by calling the Armory Box Office. Tickets are $35 in advance, $40 day of event. Designated driver tickets are $5.00 and available at the door. Beer friendly food will be available, a la carte, from Dinosaur Bar-B-Que, Bayou Café and Armory Caterers.
I realize that one more year,
The onslaught began in the second quarter, as Georgia scored 24 unanswered points to lead 34-0 at the half. To that point, Tech’s only brush at an offensive score came midway through the second quarter after a drive stalled and the Jackets attempted a 49 yard field goal. Attempted being the operative word here, as Boss Bailey flicked aside Luke Manget’s kick.
My goal was to experiment with an impasto underpainting, and glaze, scumble, and wipe away earth colors on top of it. Though not everything is working here yet, I am really pleased with one part of the painting, which is the forehead, the part where I actually took that goal seriously and went for it.
The Marine Conservation Society has also warned that anyone wanting to take a seasonal dip in the sea should be careful about getting in at the deep end. Flash foods are affecting the cleanliness of beaches and there are flood warnings in place over the weekend for many areas of the country.
Toy Story 3 won for best original song, Randy Newman. His second win and 20 nominations
Steve Madden boots
Wavering imperiously upon the windowsill
Mean while the Captain of the Vampirates takes Grace and Lorcan to the Sanctuary to be healed. Can Mosh Zu Kamal restore Lorcan's eye sight? We discover that Grace has some kind of healing power but we don't know what it is exactly yet. Grace begins her training under Mosh Zu Kamal as the Captain of the Vampirates returns to his ship. Lorcan's donor hates Grace and how close she is to Lorcan. She goes back to the ship with the captain. Oliver, Mosh Zu's #1 trainee is jealous of her. Uh Oh!
against the onslaught of day,
and only for black and white
Rousseau’s attempt to justify every form of dominance by the group over individuals then appears as an inherently patriarchal and gendered sort of dominance – and we might imagine what sort of practical policies this might lead to (men must not be sissified, or the state will be weak! women must not deny their femininity, or we will run out of babies!).
Every week these cats hook up each other with hot hits and big phazed cookies to peruse and then vote on their individual fancy catchers.
Butt 44″ – 42″
Not for nothing. It started “innocently” with S as well. In the beginning I think there were just pictures and oral rapes. The oral rapes where S participated were more violent. I have memories of passing out once. I don’t think S considered me a person. I was existed for the sole purpose as a prop for him to be able to act out what was in his sick mind. I think he was the one who made my uncle start the name calling. This is why I take offense by people willingly and knowingly refer to themselves as sluts. There is nothing positive about that characterization for me.
150ml Lime juice (about 4-5 limes)
Ollie’s mother began racing round the console too, pulling levers, and pushing buttons. But Ollie went on watching Amy, who was going through the whole hopping about, mouthing at the screen routine all over again. This time, she had some new hand movements. Ollie blinked; they looked familiar. He screwed his face up to look more closely, because screwing your face up obviously made it easier to see – ‘yes, banana,’ and ‘no alive – dead!’ What? Bananas? Dead bananas? Amy was waving again. Well, frantic flapping, more like. This time he thought she made the words ‘Remember dead banana’. Ollie made the same words back, and Amy nearly took off with excitement. Boy, that girl could jump, Ollie thought. He made the words again, just to see the effect, and he wasn’t disappointed. Amy was leaping up and down and throwing her arms around, so that the Ood sitting nearby had to shift out of the way. ‘Doctor,’ she signed; gripping her wrist as though she were taking her own pulse, and popping her eyes so wide, Ollie thought they might explode.
QAT: an African shrub that can make you high.
We had a break on Monday from our music lessons, as the schools that they are held at were all on Easter break. I was glad to have a break from the running.
Then add crushed red chilly flakes and saute till the raw smell goes (in medium flame )
Another gift...I found a journal which encourages people with disabilities to submit their writing. Some of you know about my disabilities and my struggles to deal with them as an artist and writer and even in everyday job task. It is refreshing to find a place such as this to submit work. It has to be related to their subject material, so it gave me a change to pass on my newest chapbook project...and low on the totem pole of publishing I want to do, but 'Avocado Green Kitchen With A Gold Accented Childhood' came in handy. Three of the prose fit their criteria, so I hit 'send' this morning.
Production Design by Franz Bauer
made. “The bathroom floor was
I will also send a big thank you over to Frances who sadly have to leave our team. We wish you all the best and hope that magic happens. You and your family will be in our thoughts and prayers. We will miss you dearly and hope that you one day want to come back to us. Sending love and hugs your way!
To believe that, one must believe that the authoritarian governments ruling over Arab Muslim lands these last fifty years were in no way a product of their own people, culture, mores, or desires. Soviet tanks rolling down the streets of Prague may help explain forty years of Czech Communism; what comparable outside force can explain fifty years of authoritarianism among Arab Muslims? UFOs did not drop these leaders here. They are home-grown products, just as England's prime ministers or Switzerland's federal counselors.
By measuring the flow of evolution through a series of nine Ages, the Maya predicted Man’s quantum leaps through Great Cycles of ever-decreasing size until he reaches the moment of rebirth, reunion with Galactic Center, or Ascension. That moment of planetary enlightenment is a culmination of the present ongoing process of evolution in consciousness. In the view of an ever-increasing number of spiritual and New Age groups (I like to call it the Group Mind or Superconsciousness, because we are seeing its influence all around) this spiritual evolution is scheduled to be complete by winter solstice 2012. Each day now brings new evidence of its happening all around us. Spiritual consciousness, a change in personal attitudes, is happening so fast now it could all be over long before then!
04. Hot Girls In Love
Anyway, one day I had to sort my book inventory (I have to do this about 3 times/year) and I thought the driveway would be a good place to do it. Calvin enjoyed "walking" in the garage with his walker, falling asleep in his stroller (with Ashton pushing him around)... definitely a different experience for the little guy.
I think the picture speaks for itself. Amazing.
in essence, “keep up the good works.”
Week 1: JLO Swimwear
Eventually the host mentioned that we were listening to Diane Ackerman talking about her book 100 Names for Love, which tells the story of her husband Paul West's recovery from a stroke, and the ways in which she was able to help him in the process, though their relationship was challenged and changed. The 100 names were the new pet names he came up with for his wife, when he could not recover the old ones. One of them that she mentioned was My Bucket of Hair. (She has a good head of it.) Many of the nicknames were as unusual and poetic, like My Remains of the Day, and My Residue of the Night.
They stuck us in a thrash metal category, then said we sucked because we didn’t have enough metal guitar solos. That was kinda the point, wasn’t it? Jeff was a solid guitarist, but then as now, he greatly understates and underestimates his own ability. He’d stand bone still, fingers flying on the neck as his lips twitched and pronounced each note in a bizarre facial pantomime. It sounded great, but he looked terrified every time we hit the bridge and it was his turn in the spotlight.
Well CommsConsult is an organisation who basically make it their mission to help academics and other organisations to make their projects for development work. Development being mainly that which affects developing countries.
Sunday was the final workshop in the fifth season of the Northwest Author Series coordinated by Christina Katz and hosted by the Wilsonville Library. Although my focus is young adult fiction, the age brackets aren't necessarily clean cut. Each publisher has its own definition of "middle grade," which Frederick generalized as age 8 or 9 to 12. Any information I can acquire regarding young protagonists and readers is helpful.
You and I must fight for our rights,
1 teaspoon of vanilla paste or extract
”But,” he said, ”the reality is that Ocean City is Maryland’s major resort. It’s a place where the average person can afford a vacation in, and it’s a place the masses enjoy. I would say you can’t let Ocean City fall in.”
Jeanette Almgren a.k.a. Lush Liquorice
But will I do that just for appearances? No. I already said I've come to terms with who I am. Whether you like this or not that's your business.
Special Judges:
The negative space, especially when it takes more room in the composition as the food does, can be used to emphasize on contrasts, structures, textures or to bring the attention to certain characteristics of the food.
Another track from Umber that stands out, at least to me, is "Joan Of Arc".
The abundant love of God
A side note, I watched this in 2D and noticed there weren’t much scenes good for 3D. 2D digital could be fantastic enough.
However! I'm curious, as always, to hear what you think. So, mes auteurs: yea or nay on the Booktrack experience?
It even came with a belt although I have added an old favourite.
When I eventually became an adult, the mail kind of lost it's luster for me. Most of my friends and I email or talk on the phone, so the mail became something that I didn't really enjoy. It was mostly junk mail and bills...basically someone asking for the money that I felt like I didn't have. Until now. After months of waiting, Number One Son got a couple of large envelopes, one from Charlotte and one from Greenville ...news we'd all been anxiously waiting for....
We didn’t like Less Than Zero as much as Rules Of Attraction or American Psycho. It had all the nihilism, and only a little bit of the fun. At least there were big, trippy parties in Less Than Zero. In The Informers, we pretty much only get the bad / non-fun / nihilism side. Oh, there’s some sex. But nobody in this movie seems to really be having fun. We’re presented with a conflict for 1.5 hrs, and there is never really a solution. Things just get worse.
Truth is not opposed to Jonathan. He is his opposite – Jonathan is a man living a lie and Truth is, well, the truth – but he’s not out to defeat him or even get one over on him. Or even change him if it comes to that because Truth is well aware that Jonathan’s time is limited as is his capacity for change. So he’s really not the villain of the piece. If there’s a ‘bad guy’ then it’s actually Jonathan but he’s not bad bad in exactly the same way as Albert Steptoe isn’t a bad man – you can’t really put Albert Steptoe and Voldemort or Darth Vader in the same group, can you? – but he is a nail in his son’s side. (American readers please substitute Fred Sanford.) Albert never allows his son to rise to meet his aspirations and Truth never allows Jonathan to wallow in his delusions.
Look at this mess. By the time I finished it was just a pile of crumbs... and tasteless crumbs at that. I didn't even bother licking my fingers to pick them up.....
Carefully place your jars into the large pot of boiling water (being sure to have them resting on something so that they aren't sitting on the bottom of the pot). Make sure the water covers the top of the jars by at least 1-inch. Cover and let process for about 10 minutes.
Please note: these diapers are made when you order so allow up to 2 weeks for delivery.
At any rate, such random days usually turn out awesome. This one sure did.
Lisa blinks her eyes and looks at me as time begins again to move forwards and backward.
Some new Dark Lord would surely soon proclaim
COWBOY COOKIES
Tomorrow I plan to get my cleaning done early (I hope) then sit back relax and maybe have a glass of wine.
Gone are the days when a campaign could be signed off with a nod and a wink from a confident marketing director with a good instinct for judging advertising and a deep trust in the agency employed to produce it. Instead, there’s likely to be several layers of clients in every organization all clamouring to have a hand in the approval process.
US Cascade 6.0 % 0.34 oz 3.2 Loose Pellet Hops 20 Min From End
Blouses are definitely my thing right now - you can dress it up or dress it down! I went for a sheer hidden pocket blouse - in pastel pink (instead of the one in picture) - again in attempt to bring more colour into my life :P I'm sure you could tell I'm more a minimal person when it comes to accessorizing.. a personal goal this year is to accessorize more - starting off this a gorgeous collar necklace piece! I decided to go with black as it would probably go with a lot of things and looked a lot better out of 2 other colours. Now each item was around 3000yen per piece and I could also free shipping, plus 200yen off, I'm paying with COD (cash on delivery).. it's basically hassle free shopping :D (unless you don't have cash at hand LOL). I cannot wait for everything to come!!
“Definitely.”
Breakable sky—Lovers aren’t singing—
Love 'n' Hugs Laurie xx
EGGLESS NUTELLA COOKIES
While the Solid people are eager to usher in the ghosts from Hell into Heaven, they cannot force the ghosts to go. A conversation takes place between the two and it becomes evident that the ghosts will reject the offer as they are unwilling to get over themselves and to accept anything good from the other side. The ghosts choose Hell rather than accept Heaven and all its goodness.
Seeing those words each year, carved into that stone was enough to get her through the next year until the reviews came again. She smiled and said, “Good-bye until next year. Your ‘Good Girl’ still loves you.”
The magic word is "yes."
In homage to summer and all things girly, here's a vintage Fragrant Liar salute to Spanx (circa Winter '09), with mucho thanks to Janie!
Once upon a time I enjoyed TV. Seriously enjoyed it. Looking back on my childhood years I could create a lengthy timeline detailing most of The Bionic Man's life but as for the Prime Minister then, I only vaguely recall that he gave someone the finger on, you guessed it, TV. Even crappy TV mesmerized me. To this day a German shepherd makes me think Littlest Hobo (classic Canadian propaganda). There are more music videos stored in my brain than life strategies.
It is a shame that Duchamp didnt market these as he had his pocket chess set. Spreading Duchampian chess. Lets us ressurrect Duchamps chess set. The blueprint exists, and at least we may see a day when we can play Duchamp games in computer chess online and integrate it with story scapes. Hopefully in the near future more can be designed. They are similar to those discussed previously in regards to diverging Christian crossless king and knight as art nouveau violin case also, so what was previously said about them can also apply here as well, and play also withh all this surmising on this blog and others tuning into as you have whom are reading now. However much these pieces reflect my understanding they also reflect yours. Yet even though not marketed and wide spread and used in chess play, his pocket set was more used by others, mainly other surrealists, who too had an attraction to playing chess as did also Duchamp. Yet at the exhibition not all were chess players, but Cassia has her own ways.
First rule of thumb: don't stay up until 3am when you're going to do something that requires thought the next day, even if you're having a really good time.
With the Distress Stains I colored seam binding. I didn't use any on the lace it was already nicely colored, that was from one of our members Cathi. Thank you Cathi love the lace! I found this to be extremely quick and easy to do! It dries super fast! I seen TH do this and thought to myself I love using seam binding on my projects! I blended different colors on one of the pieces. I used "Spun Sugar", "Broken China" and "Walnut". I fought with the urge not to use the distressed piece but my dd said that it really looked good with the project. So I used it and glad that I did! Next Item..
So after saying publicly on the Twitter that I wasn’t going to be attending any of the back-slappin’, shuckin & jivin’ SF BEER WEEK events, I turned coat & went to the unveiling of ELYSIAN BREWING and GREEN FLASH BREWING’s collaboration saison THE RED QUEEN last week. This took place at City Beer Store in San Francisco on a Wednesday night, and truly, I chose this event more out of convenience than anything else, seeing as how I’ve bagged on Elysian’s beers in the past & was only a fan of the Green Flash half of the partnership. And though I don’t know who’s truly pulling the strings with this beer, let it be said that Elysian is definitely getting a halo effect at a bare minimum from helping to produce this outstanding beer. Allow me to tell you about it.
I told her, “Okay, but they want songs from the movie soundtrack. Not Broadway. Some of the songs are different”. We named 3 for $10,000. Then we named 3 more for $25,000. We decided to keep going. I had 3 more songs in my head. Then, as we were going for $75,000, Jessica said “Summer Lovin’”. WRONG! The name of the song is “Summer Nights”. We were informed of the error and lost all of the money that we had accumulated. Jessica started to cry. “I’m so sorry”, she said. My heart sank. “That’s okay, we’ll do it next time”.
Security systems outside the house were a better deterrent since they gave residents enough time to initiate self-defence action or call for help.
A good wire brushing to clean up dirt and splinters and I was done. I think I will be adding a handle to the top, at the back, for easier carrying. I can use it flat or pop out the hinge and use it as an easel.
The Nurse comes in and we try to get Samantha to stand on the scale. EPIC FAIL. The nurse scared her and she wanted me to hold her. After a min, she stands on it long enough to get her weight, 26.2 lbs. She is now crying and in my arms. During this time the nurse measures her head circumference. I did not get that number. We then lay her down and measure her from head to foot. She was SCREAMING. She is 35 inches tall. I pick her up and the nurse leaves.
Anthony’s legal team already has lawyers who are qualified to defend death penalty cases and are prepared “for a vigorous defense,” said Marti Mackenzie, a spokeswoman for Anthony’s attorney, Jose Baez.
The Sino-Japanese war wasn't resolved by any stretch of the imagination that night. Hong and Nushida were pretty disappointing as they were both out of the game by the 6th inning but the crowd brought in by the spectacle couldn't be ignored. Since in the Pacific Coast League each series between teams lasted the entire week, the Oaks and Senators decided to have a rematch 5 days later on the last day of the 1932 season.
The Spaniard has more faith in the squad than some of Arsenal’s own supporters. Yet he has well-founded grounds for concern in his pandering to official egos, emphasised by the outrageous theatrics of Ashley Young yesterday. The awarding of the penalty was even more baffling than the goal given to Chelsea. By any stretch of the imagination, Young’s fall was unnatural in the way his legs and arms splayed and this highlights a deeper-seated problem – in officiating, not in the bone structure of the United winger.
GOODNIGHT MR TOM by Michelle Magorian. Classic, quality storytelling with a big heart.
Travelling along Route 66 in Texas, I found this old restored fuel station, today as I ramble through some of my images I began reflecting. Things are not and never will be what they used to be “back in the good ole days”, so making the most of the present is really beginning to bloom in my life.
Sunday kicked off after a nice night’s sleep. I hit the first panel for Summer Glau’s interview. She was one of the two cast members from Firefly that was there and I have to admit that she was actually a bit of a surprise. She is actually as shy as one might imagine her to be. Given her usually outgoing roles, I had figured it to be a geek’s imagination that other interviews of hers I had watched or read about made her seem shy and quiet. But she is just that. It was great to see her.
This book informed me that a two-room peasant house was thirty-three feet long and thirteen feet wide, and that this space was shared by the family's animals – a pig, a cow, an ox, and some chickens.
“Sure, he’d be glad to meet you.”
Logic fatigue became a saw, rasping through the centre of Rel’s skull, and he released his eyelids. The end of the Clearviewing was a hammer to the forehead and a kick to the guts all at once, and still blessed relief for all that. He rolled onto his back, clutching at his head.
Rarer that you might think.
Robert Nisbet has written on the Idea of Progress. The famous work was by J.B.Bury.
Source: Los Angeles Times
(3) The theological formulations that jelled between the Council of Nicaea (325) and the Council of Constantinopel (381) had reflected an accommodation with Greek thought, and so had the work of the great Augustine (354-430). In this period, the metaphors that early Christians used to describe their experience of and faith in Jesus of Nazareth were reinvented in the categories of Hellenistic metaphysics. Obviously, the movement from religious expression which began, essentially, as poetry, which prizes ambiguity and allusiveness, to religious philosophy, which values precision above implication, represents a decisive shift.
Here’s what happens: I’m typing along and all of a sudden the cursor jumps and often this happens in the middle of a word so I end up typing “going to the movies” as going to the mhistoryovies and then I have to go back and change it.
The SPC Blog has recently received an email from Michael Lin (Marks&Clerk, Hong Kong), who helpfully tells us:
put pudding into mold
Happy St Georges day to everyone, to all those celebrating this day around England ( and I know there are many such group events) enjoy yourselves and reflect on the life and achievements of this great man.
Upstairs (on the mezzanine level - cool!) there's the office, a lot of malt and bags & bags of hops (especially Chinook & Citra) but it's about as organised as I've seen seen a brewery to be. His bottling equipment is currently with Dave from DemonBrew and James also mentioned the help and advice he'd had from Dave and from John McGarva at Tryst Brewery (and especially from his Father!).
I'll bet you anything ol' Bill WAS in the audience of at lest one showing of this - albeit with a big Sardonicus-sized smile on his face. It would be understandable.
This perfect book for lagophiles, which even includes carrot recipes, ends with a heavenly pop-up explosion of rabbits leaping out of the last spread. Heavenly.
Some folks don't like overpowering fragrances. They find them unsettling. Therein lies my olfactory secret. Attar of Ruby could be lavender, camomile or eucalyptus, or a blend of these and other essentials, but none is distinguishable. Like Grenouille's distillation of innocence in Suskind's Perfume, this balm is subliminal. People sense it and feel relaxed, subdued, ready for the otherworld of sleep.
Also- We will be doing prizes for the top 3 winners- it won by a landside! As of right now with 52 participants that is $260 so the prizes will be awarded in gift certificates in the following amounts:
Brought together through trickery, separated through duty, Gabriel and Eden find that their worlds have changed, for both are recognizing more and more that the bond that will make them complete will not be denied. It is forever in her character to fight that which she cannot battle, and Gabriel will use whatever means in his arsenal of tricks to complete their bond and hold her to his side, until no longer able or willing to deny the love that haunts her, she becomes his in body, mind and soul. It is a coming together that binds not only one, but both, as the words they share in bonding declares. “You are mine, I am yours. Together, we are one.”
08 - Dead Giveaway 03:28
This is a quick letter, partly because....well, if I'm being honest it's because I don't remember enough to talk about it. Everything I can think of needs to go in your five month letter. Let's not get started on how behind I am on weekly pictures. Mom fail.
“But he said he wanted to correct his mistake.”
If you like your novels Dan Brown style with lots of geeky science underpinning a thrilling and clever plot, you'll love this. ~Alison Chester-Lambert, author of The Future In The Stars - The Planets’Message for 2012 And Beyond
I can also go on and on for the whole day with many other ridiculous moments and problems of Code Geass I had but I think I have said enough. Sometimes I really wonder if Taniguchi Goro intentionally made Lelouch dumb to criticize how laughable and immature real life idealism terrorists are. If that’s the case then Code Geass is indeed a very clever satire but I think I am giving it too much credits.
Jeff Brundage led American’s troubled labor relations for 11 years, most recently failing to win cost-cutting contracts in talks that began as far back as 2006. US Airways negotiated contracts, contingent upon a completed merger, with the unions in a period of less than two weeks. The TWU vote on its contract won’t affect the US Airways agreement, the union told members.
We must have the faith to radiate God’s love to all whom we see. We must ahve that faith even when we may not feel like it.
But representatives of fruit and vegetable farmers this week merely expressed reasonable disquiet when it emerged that retail powerhouse Coles, a unit of Wesfarmers, would reduce prices of fruit and veges by half. Today Woolworths, Coles' rival for the weekly food spend of urban consumers, said it would match the cuts. The price wars continue, it seems.
Many organisations say they want their employees to attain a proper balance between their jobs and personal lives, but how many really live up to it?
Lately, my little muffin is enjoying lots of tummy time. She likes to lift her little wobbly head and look around. She also loves the water during bath time. I think we may have a future swimmer on our hands! Lea is finally sleeping peacefully through the WHOLE night! Ahhhhh... gotta love it. She's beginning to give us some social smiles, and we've also gotten a few tiny chuckles. Baby girl can now suck down a four ounce bottle like its nobody's business. Her favorite song is Keri Hilson's "Pretty Girl Rock," which when I sing it to her, I usually get a crooked little smile in return. She loves visitors, so if you haven't already, (and you're not sick, of course) come by and meet our girl!
Speaking of which, it was also not surprising that a fellow writer, seminary student, and FB friend from whom I shared the link wryly questioned how many of the 30 percent have sold all they own and given it to the poor. A commenter replied with a question, "How do we interpret God's word without clouding the truth with our own biases and those of society?"
Catch up on all emails
I think, even more than that, here in the Northwest you can’t hurry summer. Nope. You can’t make it come any faster. And sometimes, it doesn’t come at all. Like the summer of 1996 in Portland - fuggedaboutit! It flooded. Eight days of 80 degree weather do not a summer make, unless you live in western Washington. Then that’s all you might get, and your tomatoes might as well kiss themselves goodbye. They don’t ripen. Supermarket tomatoes taste like paste. And fried green tomatoes are only good for some things.
Thanks for stopping by today, and thank you for all the lovely comments that you leave. I appreciate every one of them and it really does mean a lot to me when you take a minute to leave a comment :)
Jeff Andrews – I have had some amazing clients! Celebrity does not make them better though. The advantage is that people get to see the work. The process is really quite the same in that there is a client/designer trust that has to be developed early in the relationship. The collaborative process has always been a big part of work for me. I think there is some divine path that leads me to the people I am supposed to work with and learn from. I can’t say that there is a particular person I am dying to work with. I love the journey I am on and time will tell….
Ability to read, comprehend and compose common instructions, business correspondence, and memos. Ability to effectively present information in one-on-one and small group situations to customers, clients, and other Fisher team members.
And you know what? All it took was:
I also wonder how much the sentiment of the storytellers influences the choice of words and the subtleties. I think that Kuntī holds these sentiments as the secret treasure of her heart, and the storytellers may make it more apparent due to their own deep sympathy for such feelings.
Still, it's obviously tapping into some cultural zeitgeist and on that point, I'm curious. It obviously works for a lot of other people so I'd like to know why.
Serve hot in shallow bowls with some of the stock.
So here's the deal, ever since the idea of Australia came about, J and I promised each other that we'd travel for a couple of months before returning to the US. We decided that we simply couldn't be on this side of the world, without seeing a fair bit of it.
Something went terribly wrong here.
In a large stainless steel bowl, melt chocolate and butter together. Add sugar + cocoa powder and whisk together. Add in the eggs one by one and whisk till they are just mixed. Fold in flour + salt . Add the vanilla and give it one final whisk. Pour the batter into the prepared tin and bake for 25 -30 mins or until a toothpick inserted into the centre comes out with a few moist crumbs.Remove from the oven & let it cool in the pan completely. Cut into 16 squares and enjoy!
The opening scene was a lot of fun in a sick way. The camera moves up on a guy at the bathtub and I’m thinking it’s his girlfriend and they’ll hop into the tub, nope, a hand pushes him and holds his head underwater. Then the rest of the family is taken out and so forth. The sheriff comes home and talks to his murdered wife, I figure he’d assume he’s getting the typical silent treatment and go get himself a drink. Instead he notices she’s dead and while possessed he douses the house with gasoline. Note to self if I’m going to torch my house make sure to have reliable matches.
3. I Remember You
Akshayananda: “I was recently told by one devotee that the acarya does not have to be a pure devotee.
“Suzanna has made a choice, and she must eventually deal with its consequences,” the bishop pointed out.
I dared not ask him what his ways are. Phil giving me a hickey was the first thing that came to mind, though. Naughty, I know. Instead, I asked “If you were a tat artist and you get to decide what to put on me, which body part would you choose and what would you ink on it?”
HomeAway, Inc. is the world’s leading online marketplace of vacation rentals, with sites representing more than 640,000 paid vacation rental home listings throughout 168 countries. The company also makes it easy for vacation rental owners and property managers to advertise their properties and manage bookings online. The HomeAway portfolio of websites includes HomeAway.com, VRBO.com and VacationRentals.com in the United States; HomeAway.co.uk and OwnersDirect.co.uk in the United Kingdom; HomeAway.de in Germany; Abritel.fr and Homelidays.com in France; HomeAway.es in Spain; AlugueTemporada.com.br in Brazil; and HomeAway.com.au in Australia.
What is Twilight?
Tinnitus is not only an annoyance for most of us; it also causes sleeplessness and lack of concentration. This should be given some attention and should be avoided by taking proper precaution. Most of the physicians tell the patients that there is no 100% cure for it and one should learn to live with it. Few may manage it but not all.
of love (before I die)
one about my first gallery reception and
13. Coochy Coochy
...I also like Maxwell.
Who is Joseph Smith?
- I loved having photos of family and friends on the fireplace mantels and throughout the mansion. We tried very hard to have at least one photo of each guest. Throughout wedding planning we focused on making the wedding not only about the love that we share with each other, but also for our family and friends. The photos definitely helped us to accomplish that task by warming and personalizing the mansion. Our friends and family also told us that during the cocktail hour they enjoyed walking around the mansion reminiscing as they looked at the photos and being surprised when they found photos of themselves.
The Garcia, Cavazos and the Benavides lands are traditionally used for pastoralist goat and cattle herding, subsistence only, by the families also known as 'originarios'--First Peoples.
And how they sailed the seas.
A wave of guerrilla goodness has been sweeping my world.
Hi! I believe that everyone already watch this movie long time ago. This movie actually come out on beginning of December 2011, which is launch at China first then only launch at Malaysia on Chinese New Year Period. I am very regret to say that I missed this movie while it is still on the big screen cinema, many people would say that "No High Expectation on this Movie", but this movie definitely different from some white snake movie (which is have bad review about it).
These other new fabrics are from a new supplier and they are called Long Live Vintage. They have been selling really well. On the vintage theme I must tell you about The Textile Rag and Remnant Rummage sale which is taking place at Trull Memorial Hall, nr Taunton on Saturday 3rd March. If you want to find out more visit thevintagebazaar.blogspot.com
Another human in Germany, who wanted to be known only as Sarah K, 34, said that it was every human’s civic duty to be themselves and help Earth continue the downward spiral towards imminent doom. “During Earth Hour, I personally stopped burning shit into the air, you know? I even refrained from buying some illegally poached elephant tusk-ornament for my living room. It was just painful to see it online but not buy it.
Let my mouth speak only truth. Let me give peace when I can.
Muellers Ice Cream Parlor.
amazed. . . parsnip
In ice hockey there is 82 regular season games. There is merchandising, there is seat sales, there is money to be made. In the early years of the NHL (National Hockey League) teams played only around 40 games. More games equals more money. And thus money is driving the amount of games played per season.
I have grown tremendously in the last 6 months, as a person, as a mom, as a friend and so how has. But in the long run, we know this is best and we are both sincerely fine with our decision.
Honesty through anonymity is difficult. It requires one to be honest with his/her self first. This is difficult and leads to the lack of truthfulness with a partner. Leaves so many things unsaid inside my head. Still, all inside my head. Unsaid.
“Please.”
Another Saturday has come so quickly! I can’t believe it! Where are the days going? We’re already into May! The first Grace In Small Things of May!
Photo #124: May 3
in a fluorescent hive of fabric-padded cubicles?
MARSELLUS
The sentiment stamp is from Marianne's Design, "Eline's Vintage" and is Dutch. It says "Enjoy Every Moment".
More damagingly, they managed to fool Lord Blackheath of the UK Upper House of Parliament with a fake story about $15 trillion that he raised in Parliamentary session. The House of Lords is now going to summon a White Dragon Society ally to testify about what is really going on in the financial wars.
BOX
Enjoy your weekend! I'm laser skirmishing tomorrow - can't wait!
“Did you try his second in command?” the commander looked out the window.
Responsibility for disposition of human remains. Accounting for Personnel Lost in Past Conflicts – The Armed Forces Identification Review Board (AFIRB), March 14, 2008
Thank you again for all of your wonderful suggestions and for taking part in my very special wallpaper giveaway.
According to Cuthill, he was offered a reprieve in the days before his trial, if he was prepared to acknowledge royal authority and retract his statement that the King ‘deserves to dye’. Cuthill refused to contemplate the offer and asked for Cargill to be sent to him:
I should warn you, my posts are never in chronological order, rather they’re completely random and often depends on my whims and what I suddenly feel like posting.
one of my all time favourite films. I haven't stopped thinking about it since all the magnolia trees
Turning 30 wasn't bad at all. I tend to think of the 30s as the heyday of adulthood. You're still young, but you've moved past your 20s, where people still treat you like you're 17 and don't know anything whether you know anything or not. You're often building a family and a career and your body hasn't betrayed you yet, or at least not much.
If you read my Christmas recap post, you may recall that for Christmas, Matt surprised me with a trip to Vegas! (I opened a Nevada calendar in which Matt made and glued the adorable paper Vegas sign above. Super creative that guy.) I was totally shocked, and not just because we said we weren't doing presents, but because we never seem to take vacations "just because." Not because we don't want to, but because since Matt and I have been dating, our travel budget has gone towards attending friends weddings, visiting family, traveling for showers and bachelorette parties, going on job and internship interviews, etc etc. I'm so glad we chose to make those trips happen; I wouldn't trade them for the world. But I can't lie, I'm pretty excited to take a "just because" trip, just the two of us. Oh and did I mention we'll be there this time in a month? Not that I'm counting down or anything :)
The corporate state first manifested itself most obviously in Mussolini’s Italy of the 1920s. There the state concerned itself with every aspect of economic life, setting wage levels and working conditions, regulating and licensing commercial activities and closely controlling political activity.
And just when we think we’re done, Phillips turns the knife in the wound with a final detail involving dogs. This is not a cheap twist in the tail, just an example of how a great short story writer gets the reader in her grip early and never lets go – however short the piece.
Although the Axiom closed in 1992 and gave way to a similarly-themed venue called Catal Huyuk, followed by Harvey’s in 1994, I still thought of that club as the Axiom. Accordingly, I’d have to say my favorite ever Axiom moment came at a Noodle show in 1993, when our guitar ace Jonathan Toubin vomited on several people in the crowd while his mother watched from a safe distance. Being part of that was definitely a watershed moment in my musical career.
He walked down the street, turning up the collars of his coat against a sudden cold chill. You could take from the well-off and the arrogant, it was ok to relieve the smug of their reasons to be haughty; but the natural observers? Well, you just had to let them be.
I remember burning a lot of things in the oven, and making a horrid floral blouse that I never wore (it was stiff and prissy and I’m pretty sure it’s the reason that to this day I almost never wear collared shirts or floral prints). I spent most of the time being sarcastic about it all, irritated that sexist stereotypes were being perpetuated in school and figuring I’d never use the skills I learned. Home ec was for housewives, and that was not something I imagined ever wanting to be.
A spokesman for NAMA had no comment on either reported sale. And it should again be stressed that it is not confirmed that the Oxford Street sale involved NAMA at all.
There are eight wines to examine, some quite inexpensive, but that is not why E@L is here. The links do not very far up the chain, and there no Mt Edelstone and no H.O.G. tastings today. But the nips are generous and everyone is pleasant. This is where E@L first proffers his soon to be recycled apology for the deficit in his wine-tasting vocabulary.
1. Killed the Wicker Man, stole his tablet… Check!
It is really hard to see how cool this ooks IRL from the picture....but it is all puffed up and actually looks like frosting on a cake. You can use this recipe for anywhere you could use puff paint....white for snow, snow men, bunnies....etc....you get the idea right?
Dance: Waltz
Extra cost on stadium not massive blowout: Cull
So, yeah. Wish I could have stayed forever. Unfortunately it was over Spring Break and there were 1.5 MILLION other families there. That being the case, I really didn't end up wanting to stay forever after all.
My new daughter-in-law ran back to see what Meri was so shocked about and came back just as stunned. "I didn't know there was a sink in there either!"
Mick Jagger was originally considered for the part of Jack the Ripper, but director Nicholas Meyer couldn't see Jagger convincingly playing a Harley Street surgeon, John Leslie Stevenson's career when he wasn't stalking Whitechapel.
Gems & Kisses – We Love Life
And so it was on a warm August day, when I took my first critical look at Ashley Madison in several months, that I took the first steps in a long journey of scientific discovery. And by critical look, I mean I had no sexual prospect at hand so I was looking to find someone and was going to be in "Ryan's really trying mode" which I really hadn't been in for almost a year.
MAX is our guest blogger this week. If you are a faithful reader, you will remember that Max weighed in a couple of months ago on this blog. He was ready to add his two cents, again. Does that make four? It makes for a student who wants to tell the world about our iPads! Let’s check out his message for the week:
I've not actually used the program myself, but I just watched a video review of it and it looks really handy. So, if you're looking for a good deed to do, go check out the review of GreenPrint and see if it's something you can use to make our environment better.
“How’d you get the air up there?” I asked.
Hook the new thing to something they already know or know how to do. Then make them do it. A few times. Let them discuss and work together. No reason this has to be done in silence. Whether calculators are allowed depends on whether the calculator will let them avoid the things you want them to remember and see. (This particular lesson is no-calculators.)
"From home to home, and heart to heart, from one place to another
*The predator is trying to figure out the level of resistance they may meet, and people who speak very directly with a firm tone or with a strong voice are viewed as being confident and less inclined to just be quiet victims. While a person who speaks in a low voice, unclear and appears to be shy will be viewed by the predator as a sheep, not putting up much resistance verbally.*
Historically Zurich (5), Stuttgart (4) and Athens (3) have produced the most sub13 performances. While the three sub 12.90 performances to date have come in Ostrava (12.87), Lausanne (12.88) and Paris St Denis (12.88). However, Robles and Liu seem to be able to put down fast times anywhere. Of the 41 sub13's ever run they have a dozen between them (Robles -7, Liu -5). Only Allen Johnson, with an incredible 11, had more throughout his career - Colin Jackson also had 5. I would expect to see both close in on Johnson this year.
Hoping to find my feet soon - cheers, Joan.
Why is the story of Thomas Bewick relevant to Awfully Big Reviews?
The effect of high/low I.Q. has also been studied in depth, with fairly predictable results. Low I.Q. individuals performed badly in social class, family stability, income, educational levels, illegitimate pregnancy, single parent families, rate of prison incarceration, rape, violent crime etc. etc. etc.
On the inside I used the same stamps again to create my bottom border and another sentiment from Snow Swirled.
4 STARS
1 scraped
Given so, I hope it is okay for the authority to appreciate the Rakyat’s effort to wear ‘kuning’ today.
I haven't yet met anyone who enjoys getting a ticket. I've probably heard about every excuse under the sun about why a driver committed a vehicle code violation after getting stopped by yours truly.
07. Annabel Lee
Stick Pin (head pin, beads, Diamond Glaze or Glossy Accents)
Tredegar has one of the Valleys' nearest things to a town plan – an iron column with a clock on top, around which the centre revolves. Here is 'Spirit of Bevan', a film co-operative. The local miners' self-run health service was the NHS' original inspiration. There's a little monument also to a more modernist social architecture – Powell Alport and Partners' Tredegar Library, a striking, dynamic little piece of Brutalism, a riot of angles and geometries now accompanied by a mural of the town's radical heritage. It bears repeating that the idea of the National Health Service was born here, not in Manchester, not in Birmingham, not in London. And as in the surrounding towns, what the rest of the country has to present this place is out-of-town retail parks and call centres.
We are also welcoming some new faces in January, but for that you will have to wait until January 8th when they will be officially announced. ;D;D
I just wanted to say that We Remember. May God bless the families who lost someone that dark day, the children, now young people who were left without their moms or dads and May God bless the Heroes that give their lives keep trying to prevent something like this from happening ever again.
Obviously, all of these symptoms could have a medical or psychological reason behind them, but it is also likely that it is stress that are causing these problems. So how do you de-stress you life?
Things have changed since he last graced us with his innocent optimism and questionable quips. Of course, it would be churlish to remind people of the poorly written posts that characterised much of his blog output, so, instead, I simply welcome him back like a long-lost relative from the side of the family that nobody cares to talk about because they live on Merseyside and drive taxi cabs for a living.
It’s not very detailed but it doesn’t need to be for the point in this is clear. It is a negative impact because of globalization. Though this doesn’t mean there is not positive impacts I’d still like to ask…. Is it possible for the big companies, like that of the company in the story, to resist wiping out these small areas and poor people? Why or why not?
I'm just walking in obedience to where I feel God is leading me. Whether my role in this war is overt or behind-the-scenes is irrelevant. The important thing is to get educated and actually DO something for these heartbreaking victims of trafficking.
Asaba, said the woman
My personal favorite format. The Haruhi novels are great reads, albeit void of identifiable memes and internet sensations.
“Nothing is more dangerous than an idea when it is the only one you have.” – Emile Chartier
Have had school meetings, work, errands, crafting, cleaning and painting.
My wandering consisted perhaps of a journey of half a city block to a quiet corner of the playground where I would try to imagine myself someone or someplace else- but I just couldn't.
Life's moved on from 40k interest/time and I went with it. For a little while at least. I think I will be back now but I probably crammed a bit much into the short time frame I was into it and burned myself out as I am sure I was talking about in a previous post or two.
10. Makes me laugh
In order to make this article comprehensible at all to the lay reader, we therefore now need some informed speculation to explain the incomprehensible. If you follow.
She needs to be dragged around by her ovaries and shot.
But the difference on this side of the Pond – above any other – is the lack of any monocultural love of a real Nation which, for all its myriad faults, has given most US immigrants a life fulfilment that almost certainly would not have been possible in the homeland – the ‘Old Country’.
It's not like I've been totally absorbed in Christmas decorating...I'm still not done...there will not be 15 trees this year....and I'm fine with that. Seems the older I get, the less trouble I want to go to, not to mention the more practical I get...practical as in everything I take out will have to be put away again, so I find myself asking myself 'is it worth it?' many times over.
Conventional coal is not an acceptable option.
Thank you so much to everyone who joined us for our last challenge which was set by Amanda, so many wonderful girly and glitter creations.
Seating is limited and just over half the spots are already sold so get your party together and book a table by contacting The Terminus Hotel on 9481 3182. Tickets are just $79 for five courses matched to five different beers plus all the fun of a Beer Blokes Beer Dinner. The Terminus is located at 492 Queens Pde Clifton Hill.
Ruben does not sit at a table with his client but a short ways away, always with his eye on her, thus allowing other men to cabeceo her for a dance. This arrangement also looks more natural and will help the lady dance more when she goes alone to the milonga the next time.
To enter all you have to do is make a card following the sketch (making sure you include stamping somewhere on your creation - digi's are fine), and post your entry into the linky below. Check out the Rules page above for more information.
That night, Britten dreams of calling Hannah for help finding his cell phone charger. She doesn't pick up, so he leaves a message. He finds the charger, and also finds an estimate from a moving company: Mountain Top Moving & Storage. Britten is disturbed -- he didn't realize Hannah was this serious about moving to Portland. Even more disturbing is the fact that Hannah didn't tell him about this.
Ink: Brilliant Blue-retired (SU)
Estate sales and yard sales
and fast, but just loud enough that I could
So typically you wouldn’t want to shed front downforce for fast turns, by stalling the front wing. Stalling the front wing will reduce front downforce and drive the CofP rearwards, robbing the driver of front axle load just when he needs it.
We waken to You, forever home
Ok, back to the post...now...it's the best of both worlds. On one hand- I have an INSANE journal, on the other hand I have a world of games, emails and .ppts and on the other hand- I can still use all my favorite pens. (yes, I realize that is three hands-did you?)
that everyone should be able to say
Besides organizing which images I'm going to use for an upcoming exhibition I've mostly been procrastinating because, well because that's what I do best of course.
Unter allen die an der Challenge teilnehmen, wird jemand mit dem Random system ausgelost, der dieses wunderschönen Creatables von Marianne Design "Butterflies" gewinnt.
Well, Jimmy Crack Corn you guessed it.
Yeah, it’s not.
It wasn't until 1852 that these objects were reclassified as "minor planets"...which is a good thing, since we know now of roughly 300,000 minor planets that are hardly on the same footing as the classic 8. Science-wise, it makes a lot more sense to group these objects into a family of astronomical bodies, the asteroid belt. Still, for 51 years Ceres enjoyed full planet status.
Beer from Adnams Explorer 5%
i love how she teaches him, guides him.
In the entire study, fewer than 1 in 4 participants consumed two or more servings of non-fried fish per week. The American Heart Association recommends that people eat fish at least two times per week with an emphasis on fatty fish. Those in the stroke buckle were 11 percent less likely to meet the recommendations than those in the rest of the country. Those in the rest of the stroke belt were 17 percent less likely than those in the rest of the country.
It is amazing to me that you can take fabric, any fabric, and then transform it into something usable- sometimes even art! And, let me tell you, if I can sew then anybody can sew! I haven't had a lick of formal training on the subject and bought my first sewing machine at Sears just because it was pretty and had Martha Stewart's name on it. :) Bee tee dubs, I upgraded to an Elna 340 this December and it's the shizzle.
(~Won't you please be my prisoner, please, please, please.~Up)
Likelihood of terrorist attack:
Under the blossom that hangs on the bough.
It also looks like there will be a coffee bar, so you can buy your art supplies and then hang out and be an artist in the coffee shop. Is it lame to be excited about this? What’s wrong with enjoying a store that caters to out demographic?
Woohooo! 30 days of blogging for the month of November! I'm pretty proud of myself and all of you who participated too. What did you think? Too many doggy pictures? I definitely couldn't blog on a daily basis, but it did help me think a bit more creatively about posting. November was a month with obstacles that would normally prevent me from blogging (e.g., I was sick a lot, had secret knitting projects, busy holiday weekends), so it was interesting to see that I actually was able to come up with things to blog about.
“I sometimes think of the Santander Spanish Grand Prix as a useful acid test as to the effectiveness of the year’s regulations: it’s a tough, technical circuit where passing is limited. If the racing is good here, then we’re normally set for an interesting year: for 2012, we’ve already seen that the combination of DRS and KERS-Hybrid can spice up proceedings, so I hope we’re in store for a fun and eventful race next weekend.”
1425 D-V/16/2002. “The Season for Inventorying: On Ecclesiastes 3:1-8.” Lenoir-Rhyne College Hickory Humanities Forum, Wildacres Conference Center, Little Switzerland, North Carolina.
This is not to deny that we have trouble. We do. “In this world, you will have tribulation,” Jesus said. But in this world, in our tribulation, we also have an opportunity to see the hand of God at work in our lives, shaping and transforming us into the likeness of Christ in the midst of those trials. So as you read this Psalm, also be attentive to the attributes of God that make God trustworthy in our trials:
“SAILOR DOWNS” Prom to Dawn Night at the Races steak dinner will be April 28th at Germans Villa. Dinner will be served from 5-7:30 and races. Starting at 8. Tickets are $20.00 each and will be available at Decidedly Different. Horses and Corporate & VIP tables are available. Contact Missy Sheets 440-308-6152 for any tables or horses! Also all senior parents, we are looking for help to work this event, please contact Missy for more information. Thank you!
· They consider themselves divine, little gods and equal to Christ ( although they loosely veil this)
When you open the card up, there's a lovely big panel for an image and a smaller panel for a personal note. I paper pieced the image of the lovers with the same two designer papers I used to cover the various panels of the card.
Mary’s self esteem is very very low or non-existent, often when I would bring up the subject of trying to get vocational rehabilitation or attending school Mary would become angry or desperate, saying the only thing she knows how to do is pornography and prostitution. Often pornography producers and affiliated predatory industry vultures contact her to do abusive choking and SxM films. I point out that this type of “work” is killing her soul , body and spirit.
Work on Show at Six Mount Pleasant Road includes painting, sculpture, prints, photography and textile work. Most work is available for sale.
I know that. I've been putting up with the whining and the moaning for several days now. One of the reasons (besides the fact that I just wasn't smart enough) that I decided not to try to go to med school was that I realized I don't like being around sick people. The past few days have confirmed my feelings.
Don't sit near the doors. It's an invitation to get your purse nabbed and freak you out so badly you yelp like a puppy. Sitting in the middle and around other people is the safest place to be on the train.
I don’t know what’s going to happen for me in the love department.
However, Fathi said, this did not mean that NUJ had been cowed into silence. In fact, the union had issued a statement a day after the rally asking whether the police action against the media was meant to cover up the wrongdoings of their men on duty.
the girls were beside themselves.
Both Mr. Adnan and Ms. Shalabi were released by deals negotiated at a time when their physical survival seemed in doubt, making death seem imminent. Israel apparently did not want to risk a third intifada resulting as a reaction to such martyrdom. At the same time Israel, as usual, did not want to seem to be retreating, or draw into question its reliance on administrative detention and imprisonment. Israel has refused, until the present, to examine the grievances that gave rise to these hunger strikes. In Hana Shalabi’s case her release was coupled with a punitive deportation order, which cruelly confines her to Gaza for the next three years, away from her family and the familiar surroundings of her home village of Burqin near Jenin in the West Bank. There are some indications that Ms. Shalabi was not fully informed about the deportation feature of her release, and was manipulated by prison authorities and the lawyer representing her interests. The current hunger strikers have been offered similar conditional releases, but have so far steadfastly refused to resume eating if it led to deportation or exile. At this time it is unclear how Israel will respond. There is a fierce struggle of wills between the strikers and the prison authorities, between those with hard power of domination and those with the soft power of moral and spiritual courage. The torment of these striking prisoners is not only a consequence of their refusal to accept food until certain conditions are met. Israeli prison guards and authorities are intensifying the torments of hunger. There are numerous reports that the strikers are being subjected to belittling harassment and a variety of punishments, including solitary confinement, confiscation of personal belongings, denial of family visits, denial of examination by humanitarian NGOs, and a hardhearted refusals to transfer to medically threatened strikers to civilian hospitals where they could receive the kinds of medical treatment their critical conditions require.
The Yoga Sutras teach us that the entire world is our own projection, and that things outside neither bind nor liberate us; only our attitudes toward them does that. For example, think about the belief that “life is hard.” If you operate from this assumption, everything you do will seem like a struggle. You look for challenges in every situation, potentially creating your own roadblocks. Instead, if you turn that around to “I am meant to succeed,” then you open your mind to new ideas. As my yoga lineage guru Sri Swami Satchidananda said, “There’s nothing wrong with the world. You can make it heaven or hell according to your approach.”
Come to think of it, maybe I shouldn’t publish this … they might read it and lose their objectivity. And that would be a sad loss indeed.
Thus, talk of an uprising may be premature, and even without substance. Away from the centre, the situation is reported calm. One wonders whether the more severe reactions will come not from the Greeks, but from the German people, when they realise what their rulers have committed them to.
Here are the 12 steps which have helped many in Alcoholics Anonymous, based on the idea that our healing comes when we admit we are powerless, and rely on God, our Higher Power, to free us so we may discover the joy of life again. They may be applied to other types of addictions too:-
For the afternoon, we walked around Waikiki taking in all of the activity. Waikiki looks like it's about to burst at the seams with all of the buildings. I saw new stores and a new Trump tower, which looked beautiful. We walked around the International market place but I didn't buy anything knowing I could buy souvenirs at the Aloha stadium at a cheaper price later in the week.
But most of my projects are spontaneous, and I wouldn't have it any
One of the gifts we saw was a vase given to the Great Leader, she told us, by the people of Cyprus. “It is a million years old,” she told us.
By the way, Lillian I’ll be ready for your quillows soon. So if you would like to bring them when we meet for our next Art Journaling class that would be great.
Ah, I kinda like this episode. Yes, its as crazy as ever, but I had dear Jae Hyukie keep me company with his cute!
A peace treaty was signed and agreed to, basically leaving things as they were before the war started.
I beg you to grant the grace of conversion
I highly recommend Luna Negra to any people who love to dine and if you like pizzas, that being Italian style or New York style. You’ll surely enjoy pizzas at Luna Negra. Happy Friday!
Rumor has it that the Avengers are actually ‘fighting’ two villains and not just one, as the trailers and hype lead us to believe. The catch is however, in classic comic book style, that this mysterious second villain is waiting in the shadows with a much more sinister purpose and it is none other than THANOS!
Next: Top Ten Films of the Year
This, she added, was evident from the recent elections in many European countries where several parties fielded candidates not on the basis of race or immigration but specifically on the basis of Islam.
Caitlin is a mother but is a feminist. She believes that all women have the right to determine what they want out of life and go for it. When Caitlin got married, she didn't think it was going to be the best day of her life. She wanted something low key. Her and her mates and her family could treat it like a laugh and get pissed in the pub.
The Malcolm Hardee Documentary Preview at the Newsroom on Saturday attracted 21 people. Not bad for an event that is not listed in the Fringe Programme.
If you’re feeling brave, you tackle the walk to West End in the daylight hours. I’d been warned before that West End wasn’t a place you go unless you really have no way of avoiding it, and I really wanted to go to Avid Reader, so there was really no way of avoiding it. The walk there wasn’t so bad – there was the usual riff-raff you’d expect in a not-so-safe district of a capital city, shoeless men slurring drunkenly at passers-by with open alcohol containers on the footpath – but it was the walk back to SLQ that opened my eyes just a little bit, and had me dashing across the pavement a little quicker than I usually would. A man staggered over to the ANZ across from us and started bashing on the glass doors, which were, of course, locked solid. He was cussing loudly (something about being ripped off?), was obviously very drunk, and I feared the glass might actually shatter at one point. Ah, West End, the memories.
The ruling didn’t really attract a whole lot of interest among the political parties and candidates, though special interest groups and Super PACS would no doubt have preferred to keep the old system in place.
You are on another level,
I am thankful for fuzzy friends like the hedgehogs, dogs, hairless rats, and other pets I have had the privilege of knowing over the years. (I am also thankful for non-fuzzy pets!) Animals give us such strength and comfort; I believe that they are every bit as soulful as people. I also love learning about the work people do with animals like Koko the Gorilla (who has been taught to sign with humans) and service animals who help their owners overcome a number of challenges.
We believe in people coming together and enjoying themselves; taking time out from the daily routines that rein their lives; Stella is always there to offer them a free pass to a care free time, a delightful experience and enjoyment with every sip. Stella is all about "Good friends and Good time"
Here Carsten (1967, p. 50) also reports on not mistaking the rivalry between the Fascists and the Communists as being pro-establishment.
With Daisy, I started out waving the flag on both sides of her. I would wave for a bit and she would circle around me or away from me; once she stood still and wouldn't move I'd stop waving and put the flag behind me and rub her for a bit. Then I'd start again, and then move to her other side, and then slowly touch it to her until she didn't move away, and finally moved to putting it on her. I gave her breaks (releasing pressure) throughout. It worked so well! It makes so much sense, but I've never really thought of it in that way.
I’m not going to tell every story, especially not the ones that are still in circulation–some things are meant to be just ours, after all–but I wanted to recount a couple of stories from our raiding history. More importantly, I want to know YOUR stories.
Penguin: "I can draw a picture of Daddy?"
"Who cares about money?! This is ART, you blockhead! This is great music I'm playing, and playing great music is an art! Do you hear me? An art! Art! Art! Art! Art! Art!
I published my play on Kindle yesterday, but I didn’t include a preface.
One sister inherited 27 Harlequin romance novels, a West Elm starburst mirror, kitchen cannisters, and the lamps I was making over for her but won't be able to finish because it is too cold to spraypaint. The other sister inherited pink sparkle glitter shoes and a number of other items for Denise. My mother received cooking tins, my entire stash of spraypaint (waaah, did not want to give those up), an electric can opener, and she agreed to transport a Keurig coffeemaker to my grandmother. My inlaws received a cold storage food bag and two olive trays. Everyone received at least one cold storage bag from Wegman's, because I can never remember to bring them to Wegman's with me and thus end up buying one every time I go.
There are a number of websites out there which provide free and convenient access to the massive amounts of research that have accumulated on the health benefits of natural substances over the past 50 years. The government database known as Medline (which can be searched without special permissions or charge) contains over 19 million biomedical citations from over 5,000 scientific journals, many of which focus specifically on the therapeutic action of foods, vitamins and spices on serious, even life-threatening disease.
So it's been at LEAST five items since I last mentioned the Middletons....and issn't this dress so them? Yes, it's a little low and a little short for Kate these days, but I feel strongly that if she were still a single gal about town, this would be a date night dress for her.
“Every New Year is a resumption of time from the beginning, that is, a repetition of the cosmogony. The ritual combats between two groups of actors, the presence of the dead, the Saturnalia, and the orgies are so many elements which…denote that at the end of the year and in expectation of the New Year there is a repetition of the mythical moment of the passage from chaos to cosmos.”
The pessimists feel, theres little time
I could enlist the male friends who are interested in me, but I don’t feel like giving the this is not a date speech. My hunger for companionship hasn’t sunk that far down just yet.
It looks like the dogs and I will be confined to the house for the next couple of weeks, to avoid the ticks and also unwanted attention from the male dogs of the village, as Beki is in season.
Namaste. The spark of creativity in me bows to the spark of creativity in you.
Reinforce the spaces between the "e" and "a" and "m" with some additional tape. That will make the entire template more stable to work with. Don't worry about cutting out the inside of the "d", "e" and "a". Not necessary!
So the first man goes up and says money. So he lands into a pile of money.
When you look back on your past relationships, very few (if any) ended the way they began. Somewhere along the line, “love” became hate. People who used to creep each other’s facebooks every twenty minutes to see what their true love was up to, eventually delete each other because they can’t stand seeing the other’s status updates in their newsfeed.
Thursday 5th April: Meetings back to back & still in a suit at 7pm. Shins feeling sore from a week spent in hard heeled shoes.
"Jessie's Girl" by Rick Springfield
“I wanted to make this film to tell the story of water and how the tar sands are impacting an element essential to all life on this planet,” said Lavallee. “I hope that audiences will listen to the voices in this film, to see the impact the tar sands are having and be moved enough to become advocates for an energy future that does not pose such a great risk to our water resources.
Here's Vieux Jeanne Jeune port Jaune just a couple of years ago.
“They’ve paid for the privilege. The store charges its consignment authors according to a tiered fee structure: $25 simply to stock a book (five copies at a time, replenished as needed by the author for no additional fee); $75 to feature a book for at least two weeks in the “Recommended” section; and $125 to, in addition to everything else, mention the book in the store’s email newsletter, feature it on the Local Favorites page of the store’s website for at least 60 days, and enable people to buy it online for the time it’s stocked in the store.And for $255 — essentially, the platinum package — the store will throw in an in-store reading and book-signing event.”
Has the local pub made an effort? What can they do? The rules are clear, smokers are to be treated with utter contempt and offered something that wouldn’t even qualify as a bus shelter. That is the law, thanks to the whining antismoking bigots. They didn’t even throw us out to the shed – we can’t be allowed to have that much shelter.
Hang around actors long enough (or at least as long as you can stand), and you’ll hear about “The Actor’s Toolbox.” Basically, it refers to a collection of skills — accents, movement, building a character, textual analysis — which every performer on the stage uses to help bring a character to life. It’s a metaphor that I happen to like. You can’t build a house, or a role, after all, without the proper instruments. An actor I directed long ago referred to his “actor’s golf bag,” which was apropos, since he delivered every line like he was clubbing a woodchuck with a 4-iron. But whatever metaphor floats your boat.
o Spiva Center for the Arts (3rd & Wall Streets) Photo Spiva 2010 Photo Spiva Kids New Directions by Nick Kyle
For the sake of sweet.
But even then i dont think Cornelius could sell the range he now sells. The thing that opened my eyes to this most this year was the introduction of Nogne O beers to the Edinburgh Market, had these beers been available in 2007 im sure Cornelius would have had some of them, but in not sure how well they would have sold. But this year not only did Cornelius sell the full range but so did Great Grog and Appellation wine.
And that was my first, of many goals. And I continue to set small goals for myself to keep it interesting. To keep doing things that I never thought possible. There's something SO exhilarating about crossing a half marathon finish line and leaving all of that baggage behind.
Unfortunately, I only appreciated half of the songs on this E.P which is saddening to say the least.
I exercise to avoid feeling irritable._____ I exercise despite recurring physical problems._____
I think the main thing these experiences bought home for me was the feeling that it is possible to continue to serve, care and help the healing process, even after death.
That there is a hawk, who is also a conductor. A dual-baton-wielding hawk conductor in a spiffy tux. She didn't include what musical piece he was dealing with at the time, but I imagine it was something along the lines of this right here.
Forget about your pains, diseases or financial condition and
Goldstein commented, “It’s a little bit—it’s a lot embarrassing when people suggest that this massive fight is about me or my efforts.” He noted that it involves “literally hundreds, or thousands of people”
“Ms. F,” she said, obviously forcing herself to be patient. “He’s gotta faaht before he leaves. It’s for his own good.” She ushered me through a second set of doors.
I wanted something light for dessert, so I went for passionfruit sorbet with little almond tuilles on top and a puff of coconut whipped cream.
We had our picture taken together.
President Barack Obama’s under-the-radar campaign to spur turnout in the African-American community is echoing the promise of post-election flexibility given last month to Russian strongman Vladimir Putin.
Avoid all artificial sweeteners, flavor enhancers and (partially) hydrogenated oils/fats (trans fats) as they are the main causes of obesity and disease.
Photo by Arne Stovset Gjone
The second seminar was about Interactive Reading Communities for Young People and Julia Eccleshare said that the new Guardian Children's Books website already had 850,000 users after less than three weeks. Keith Grey doesn't even have a website but was Scottish Booktrust's first Virtual Writer in Residence. M. G. Harris, on the other hand, whose hero of The Joshua Files has a blog, wrote his posts on a special website.Anna Rafferty, Head of Puffin Digital, made the excellent point that what children like is not digital for its own sake but social.
Preheat oven to 350. Boil Squash and onion and some salt for about 5 minutes. Remove from heat and drain in colander, pat to dry. Set aside. Grease a 9x9 Casserole dish. In separate bowl stir carrots, sour cream, seasonings and Soup. Gently fold in Squash. Salt & pepper the mixture. Put it in the casserole dish. Top with durkee onion rings and crushed cheez its. Bake for 25-30 minutes at 350!
My worst moment came when my (eventual) agent, who had been agonising over a fantasy called Rebel Angels, eventually turned it down. I thought I’d blown my best chance. But she did then accept the novel that became Crossing The Line, and sold it to Bloomsbury; and in the meantime I’d sold Bad Faith to Strident, a small Scottish publisher – so I had two books published within a year. I’d say the whole process was no more difficult and frustrating than I expected, but it certainly needed doggedness, as well as a big dollop of brass neck. Writers do need a brass neck and a thick skin, so it was just as well I developed both!"
Love and Momentum is an epic adventure, a journey of self-exploration and discovery. Unfolding narratives pull the observer into a magical world of fantasy and lore, where Mays’ pieces come alive lavished with rich, saturated colors that evoke dreamlike landscapes. Abstract lines and shapes flow into one another, a multiplicity of patterns become human and organic forms and flora, animals, astronomical objects and machinery, underscoring the artists love of fusing art, science, technology and the natural world. There is a sense of play and excitement, inviting the viewer to get lost in each piece and find meaning in new discoveries, generating their own narrative based on what they see. With Love and Momentum, there is a constant rhythm and cycle of life, death and rebirth that plays out, the never ending transformation from one world to the next and the realization of humanities’ fragility yet might. With Love and Momentum, the artist amplifies the challenges and triumphs that exist within and seeks to expand our definition of what is possible.
Ginger garlic paste – 1 teaspoon
Oct 10 2008 San Diego, CA @ The Casbah
Morrison was influenced by a lot of junk spirituality. He was born into a peripatetic military family and claimed that, at age four, he witnessed American-Indians dying by a roadside: ‘Indian scattered on dawn’s highway bleeding.’ Morrison believed that the soul of a dying Indian leapt into his body. The family did pass a reservation at the time, travelling from one army base to another, but his sister tells it different: ‘He enjoyed telling that story and exaggerating it. He said he saw a dead Indian by the side of the road, and I don’t even know if that’s true.’ In an article for his old website, no longer online, Irvine Welsh ridiculed this: ‘Like the dead Indian’s soul is thinking yeah, I’ll jump into this stupid pretentious middle-class child body.’
But you know what? Vision 2030 is a hell of a lot more than I, and many of you, thought it was. There came a time when people realised we needed to stop saying “It’s about time the government started fixing our roads” and instead exclaiming, “It’s about damn time we played a significant part in fixing what is wrong with this country.” There was a time I had given up hope on proper roads in Kenya, on ever seeing a train making its way through Nairobi, even on basic traffic rules being followed. But now, this Friday, the 2nd of March 2012, we are breaking ground on Kenya’s second Transport and economic development in corridor, the first to be a Kenyan initiative, stretching from Lamu to Juba to Addis Ababa and hopefully, one day, across Africa to the Atlantic.
quality could have been better, paint was a bit spiky/spotty on part of the back of her dress, but it's not all that noticeable so whatever, cute fig all the same.
of specialised equipment, meant
ところでその興奮がまだ覚めやらない今日、今度は私個人に、大きな宝物が届きました。箱を開けてそこに座っていたクレージーのベアを見たときの驚き、そしてそれに添えられた手紙を読んだ瞬間、涙が出ました。
We are sponsored this time by Ellephantastic.
EPOS won't wait, the way a nurturing publishing house and skilled editor used to. Fortunately, Hardinge's work isn't that much of niche taste to put her in danger of losing her public. But this latest book does make me wonder about writers who don't look for the lowest common denominator. I hope there will always be a place for them in a world where young readers are offered so much that is ersatz and formulaic.
1 novice
"We will not rest until Our President is cooking up home brews in the White House using hops from the Willamette Valley. Or better, we’ll send him a few rhizomes, and he can plant a few Oregon hop emeralds in his backyard right next to those honey bee boxes."
Will their love for each other ever win out? Will Shay lose her ranch and livelihood? What will happen to Shay’s daughter, Olivia whenTroyleaves? How will the author resolve seeming impossible situations?
B-Side's "Present Tense" gets a little more power pop, like the Poster Children or something Bandwagonesque they make a real fast tempo feel dreamy somehow, as deceptively quick as they're going for, it just sounds like a MBV at the wrong speed, and that's a good thing. It's definitely hard to keep this melody distinct under the distortion cycles that barely have a chance to fade before they're moving on. Or it's those harmonies with impossible to distinguish lyrics here... backing angelic oooo's.
Nina is being reborn. She is pushing against the people who manipulate her. The embryonic black swan makes its presence felt in the nightclub, the dull beat and pink haze approximating a womb. Taking a bath she comes gasping to the surface.
Food was provided by Paula and one of her friends. We had candied nuts with Rosemary, 4 kinds of cookies, chocolate dipped strawberries, and homemade bread with a delicious goat cheese spread. Of course, there was wine and water for the thirsty.
Arsenal face Birmingham in the Carling Spoon final next tomorrow. We played a football vs Rugby match two days ago.
Pretty simple explanation and not too interesting.
if you say
Several years ago, Hollywood churned out three movies in a row – Deep Star Six, Leviathan and The Abyss – that all featured a claustrophobic monster hunt in a cramped undersea station environment. Of those only the latter had any merit as James Cameron, pre-Titanic, got to work out his aquatic fixation.
First of all, happy Valentine's Day! I hope that you all feel extra loved today!
I want to shop at markets around the world.
“We developed a sustainability index for clothing, in alliance with Wal-Mart and companies that represent more than half of the apparel sold around the world. It gives retailers information about how products are made, and the customer can make the ultimate decisions. What we’re setting up could be applied to every product someday” - Yvon Chouinard, Patagonia Founder.
You know every action star from the past thirty years? Well they are going to be in the Expendables 2, which is the follow up to Sylvester Stallone’s 2010 helmed film about a group of mercenaries who basically blow stuff up and kick a whole ton of ass. This time around we get the likes of Jean Claude Van Damme, Chuck Norris, Liam Hemsworth, and returning members Stallone, Bruce Willis, Arnold Schwarzenegger, Jet Li, Jason Statham, Dolph Lundgren, Randy Couture, and Terry Crews. So bad-assery commence.
Please email us to let us know the film is on its way and so that we can keep in touch: please include details of the film (title, director, date, original format, country, language and a synopsis).
Then go to register at the NBI Central forums and post “Hey, I started a new blog!” along the the URL to the blog. Make sure you post in the right forum or prepare to be flamed. (and don’t sign your post, we can all see your damn name in the side bar!)
WESTGATE
Weather: Partly Sunny
I think Mr Martin deserves praise for what is a dignified response to an undignified situation. He does not attempt to deny there was a problem. Indeed, he quite clearly accepts that there was one.
Europe is freezing over as the United States has been experiencing an unusually mild winter thus far.Cold winter in Europe = global warming theorists are wrong! Warm winter in U.S. = global warming theorists are wrong!
Concerning the phrase “not made with hands,” I’m not sure the contrast is with the invisible and the visible. Hebrews 9:11 states that “not made with hands”=”not of this creation.” Paul basically tells us the same thing in 2 Corinthians 5:1. We have a “building from God” “not made with hands.” It seems Paul uses this phrase simply to say the resurrection body is not brought about by human efforts. It is “from God.”
Duck Rabbit Barleywine
Gregory: Rick Perry has proved to be a moron
(Sadly, no photo – we were too busy eating to take the photo)
that the best bit is the first bit and the last bit. In between the
When getting on the train, they walked to a conductor to explain the project and asked for a permission. Despite of the strict JR company rules, the conductor was excited and even willing to cooperate in the project.
and he will always, and so will rainbow/goldfish.
Which do you like best — to be wooed or pounced upon?
We recommend that Maynooth Jewellers runs a campaign whereby members of the public post photos of a dress, suit or pieces of jewellery which they wish to accompany with a purchased item from Maynooth Jewellers. Employees can then propose particular items which they feel may suit the customer’s original article. As an incentive to partake in this initiative, we advise Maynooth Jewellers to offer a discount to consumers who purchase items from the store advertised by this campaign.
I give this book 4/5 stars.
Well, this is an interesting article. This article post last January reported on a study done on Twitter. They found that Twitter actually shows regional variation and dialect.
... rainy Tuesdays are worse than rainy Mondays.
they hadn’t been harmed. It was a student who was not involved in the original incident who stumbled across the video and whose complaint started the storm of controversy.
Oh my, I may need to change my ways and become one of the bloggers who post only once a week listing every day, for I am ' very tardy ' in my postings. The weather in Palm Springs continues to be beautiful, with hardly any wind.. now that I've said it that, we'll get a howler for sure. We seem to be avid weather report watchers ( aren't all Canadians? ) but we get a kick out of the extended forecasts for this area, as how do you describe each day differently when the weather is the same? So, you change the forecast slightly: brilliant sunshine, full sunshine, plenty of sun, sunshine and warm, sun with a few clouds and so on. Whatever way it is described, we'll take it and enjoy it.
Based on his immediate familiarity I assumed he had been at my show the previous evening. In fact I was so sure of this that I convinced myself I recognized his face.
But even with atoms, there are not always matched pairs of electrons, since there is no atomic rule that says that electrons will always be created in even numbers. So there will often be what I will call the odd one out and when that happens, the entire atom will then be charged positively or negatively, depending upon the odd one out. When this happens, this atom will seek out another atom, which has an odd one out of an opposite charge. That has a name: Magnetism. I’ve just explained magnetism. Now, science knows part of that already. What they have not realized yet, however, is that all things have a duality. They suspect it and there are theories that will show it soon enough, and I’ve given it to you today because it always has existed in someone’s mind.
Writer released: “Kang San is a justice, strong and really a man, he is a character who is like father with Lee Kang To”. This time release his foolish image but on the drama he will show you a hero image, too. You will surprise with these two images of him.
Pack 1:
My first memory that I can remember is of my mom. She's pregnant with my little sister and she's showing me her belly explaining to me how to be a big sister. I remember my favorite outfit to play dressup in was the dress that my mom wore on her first date with my dad. In my world, it was a place of magic with princesses and princes and dragons and knights and there was never a time that she told me it wasn't. She encouraged us to dream, to live life in color and i've done that and never looked back. She sped to bring me clothes the time some girls in middle school poured water down my pants just so that I could face them in the same day. Even in the midst of what at the time seemed like her biggest failure, my mom was the one with a deathlock grip on me just telling me over and over that she was going to fight for me. When I called her from 800 miles away, asking if 32 days was too soon to plan a wedding, she was my biggest advocate.
Church was amazing! It was the best service I'd been in in a very l-o-n-g time. It was the kind of place you'd feel forced to assume some growth. I decided right there that I would have to visit here again. After that we all went out for lunch. By the time we got home, I was rather exhausted and took a nap, forgetting all about fretting over my husband not being there and besides, he'd be home tonight!!
Recently Gartner has come up with a press release which talks about Five Cloud Computing Trends That Will Affect Cloud Strategy Through 2015. The release talks about 5 points – (1) Formal Decision Frameworks Facilitate Cloud Investment Optimization, (2) Hybrid Cloud Computing Is an Imperative, (3) Cloud Brokerage Will Facilitate Cloud Consumption, (4) Cloud-Centric Design Becomes a Necessity and (5) Cloud Computing Influences Future Data Center and Operational Models.
You can click to its established web-site and look some stuff for that gentlemen too. Louis Vuitton, a brand name that is best known for the ladies luggage and handbags is taking the pocket book styles to the next level and consumers have formerly presented a perplexing a reaction to the newest pocket book collection by louis vuitton utah leather. If you are spending entire quantity for any particular item then it's your task to check on its excellent whether it's original or otherwise and probably this is exactly why, we have now refrained you from acquiring Louis Vuitton purses everywhere you go different. This company is detailed in all over the world and it’s got close to 300 unique out allows around the world, so I'm sure it wouldn't be described as a issue you get one.
After a few necessary developments to bring Asgard back from Ragnorak, and cleverly dropping it in my home state of Oklahoma, Straczynski got on with the nifty plot twists: Loki’s return, his clever means of getting the more dubious Asgardians back on their feet, and his manipulation of time and Thor to put Balder on the throne were great reading.
Elmo Loves You - Plantin Schoolbook, I used the font tool in Cricut Craftroom, set at .6 and then welded.
When she finally packed it in, you had to climb in on the passenger side and slide across the front seat to take the wheel and one of the windows was permanently at half-mast.
Research Assistant, Institute for Conflict Management
As for the rest of the pirates, they’re done in by a combination of deliberately comic editing and the silent medium itself. Take the early scene where the pirate captain, not yet ousted, has the crew of a captured vessel tied together, beaten and robbed. One holdout, seeing his comrades’ valuables pouring into the pirates’ bags, decides to swallow his valuable jewelled ring. The captain witnesses this, unholsters his knife, hands it to a subordinate and orders him to retrieve the ring. You can guess how that gets done. But the scene isn’t horrible at all—it’s funny, since the camera stays on the pirate, never cutting (ha) to the victim. Nor can we hear the victim’s screams of pain, because the film is silent.
And, besides all of the above, it just seems that evil people prosper. It just seems like You bless the bad guys. You know the ones: the players who are cocky and break all the rules and give our team a bad rep. The guys who tell fellow players, "You suck. You should quit." God, You know who I am talking about. I try to have intergrity, to do the right thing, to encourage those around me. It seem there is no reward for this!
that linger like a ghost
under me
I will have to retrace the pattern and figure out how to fit my new shape (this is a SWAP goal). My former shape required a 1 3/4 inch spread when doing a traditional Y shape FBA. I think my new shape requires a 3/4 inch spread (not as reduced as I requested, evidently!). I had this surgery in June and I am still unable to wear a traditional b r a – I’m still wearing a sport’s b r a and will be for quite a few more months. Therefore, I’ve been told, I have a uniboob. Sigh. (Mothers!) And I’m quite self-conscious in posting photos. What is still healing are the underlying muscles – there is no way I can even wear a larger size band for 5 minutes. So I have no idea what my final size will be but I’m thinking a D cup based on my latest attempt at trying on b r a’s.
Artists:Erika Jayne
2 cups flour
Rach
Activists, however, are of the view that the government cites this as a reason to maintain power.
for tomorrow
If it is your passion or even if you have never tried it before and want to give it a shot, do it, you may surprise yourself . Also don’t take anything personal, just keep trying and have fun!
That being said, I’ve had a couple conversations with a woman who works in the same building as me. I’ve written about her in a previous post (A Diversion). We seem to share a lot of the same interests. She is unbelievably nice; has a calm and peaceful demeanor; and, comes across as very smooth and together. In comparison, I’m sure I come across as an awkward robot.
~ 4 gingerbread house kits - reg. $10 - 3 @ $2 and 1 @ $2.50
Mahakama Ya Wa Mama Wa Africa
I will be taking 9.5 years of memories with me....
Now serves- silently in stillness, but not I, I cry
Posted on: 2010-11-07 13:05:45
1 brown onion, peeled, sliced into 6-8 pieces
I just thought some of you might like to know that I updated two Obihai and VoIP-related posts on my blog today.
but I know very well ...
I am heading into the last few months at post, which seems quite unreal. I truly feel like I just got here. Even though I think I'm having another bout of culture shock, as little things like traffic and prayer times are starting to get on my nerves more than they were a few months ago. I chalk it up to a normal pattern of adjustment, especially after an extended period in the States.
What has filled my mind all day were his words about using art to create a sense of history in your home. "I have kept a number of pieces over the years that remind me of people, places and emotions. They decorate my living space and keep my personal story at the front of my mind. They tell me where I have been and how I arrived at this place in life, while also guiding me into the future."
So my question is, when one decides to snoop through someones emial/facebook/etc, is this a way of basically asking for it? I mean, the saying goes something like if you snoop, you'll find something, but honestly how accurate is that? Shouldn't it be that if someone snooped that they shouldnt have to find anything because there is nothing bad there? I could have Mister look through all of my stuff, but there is nothing that he would come across that would upset him. That's not because I'm a sneaky person and went deleting everything - it's because I don't have anything to hide!
And steady as hollow stone
Rubs
My mind is simply unmatched as I think on a lighter level.
“Oakie dokie.” I answered feeling all grown up because mommy needed my help. I wanted to make the breakfast good. Just like mommy did. There was no fruit like on the picture on the box in the refrigerator, so I ran out to the backyard and picked the berries growing on the fence. I washed them in the sink from the chair I had pushed over so I could reach. I used the bubbly stuff from under the sink. Then I put them in the bowls. I poured in the cereal and milk over that and I brought it bowl by bowl to my mom and dad.
Well, thanks, honey! I will like it if I get to try one, so did you save me a piece? His answer was: "Oh... let me see if there is any left!" :)
“One day you’ll have kids, and I hope they turn out just like you!”
AvitalLeibovich: Tomorrow will be the third day in which children living in Southern #Israel(7-40km from #Gaza ),will stay in shelters and not go to school. The Sound of Terror: 6 Rockets From Gaza Strike Ashdod by idfnadesk Arab Israeli Defends Israel On South African Campus Fail Of The Day Do you know J Street? by myisraelHE Barry Rubin: No Picnic: What a War with Iran Really Means PA elections will be delayed. What a surprise.
And while I appreciate my sons have cell phones, I think “tracking” them is going too far. Anyway, here is what one guy wrote in response:
The police service is entrusted with powers to protect South Africans. We cannot allow these powers to be abused for crimes and destructive behaviour. Strong action is needed and the SAPS must be accountable to the citizens of the Western Cape.
Despite falling volume, despite non-confirmation of leading technical indicators, price has pushed up through resistance. Not only did we close above the 1165 area, we tested it yesterday and are resuming the uptrend. In our opinion, putting a little more money to work in equities would be ok. It would be nice to see a deeper correction before adding any more allocation to stocks. As long as RSI and MACD don’t deteriorate further, the new allocation to equities will stay in place.
I remember the way my father’s voice boomed too loudly at me as he stood in my doorway and told me that ‘after Christmas things would change’.
We're leaving them in the field for a reason. They're horrible. They're a perfect case of the illusion that everything that's an heirloom is better. Although beautiful and thoroughly purple, they were always left untouched when we cooked up a selection of potatoes. I don't know what was wrong with them, but their texture reminded me of leftover fries reheated in a microwave.
So I mentioned food earlier. We ate at In & Out Burger. It was pretty good, I'd recommend it if you happen to be in Dallas. Medieval Times serves a pretty good spread & there's a lot of food too. My very favorite meal was at Maggiano's. A must try when you're near one!
But, many other moms feel that playing sports with friends builds more than just good friendships. “Healthy minds, muscles and habits form while having fun!”
Scripture Reading from Corinthians
Oops, Crump plumb “forgot” to mention that Trayvon had beaten the hell out of Zimmerman at the same time that he was supposedly on the phone with the girlfriend, and then denied that it ever happened.
Corner of 111 Street & 87 Avenue, University of Alberta Campus
1) Visual Metaphor - the hand with the vice grip. It's a good gag, and appropriate to the character and story, but kind of obvious since it is half literary.
THIS S IS ANIMATED YOU SHOULD FOR RIZZLES CLICK THE PICTURE
The two worked together in 1998 on the back of the Brahan Seer Festival on a project called Celtic Trails. A bus trip to important Highland locations in local tales combined stories and sketching sessions.
I’ll begin with a quick anecdote. This week, I had the opportunity to interview a deaf female victim of legal abuse. This unique experience was made possible by a relay service. The deaf individual signs into a video camera – videophone device, which is sent – via the Internet – to an interpreter. The interpreter reads the sign and speaks to a relay operator, who in turn speaks to me. When I speak, the whole process is reversed. This is truly a miraculous system, and it makes communication that would otherwise be impossible – commonplace.
“How many?” Hood knew Tanner would have anticipated the question.
a juicy smile;
Not with that attitude.
One must have a Google Profile to use this feature. When a user click on the +1 button their Google profile gets associated with that link in search, on ads, and across the web and this shows up in their profile activity on Google Profile page.
Welcome to the world of writing. Prepare yourself for this fast paced, unsympathetic world. Do not ever give up. No is never the end, it’s only the beginning for better and more possibilities that will show the world your talents. Never stop writing and never let an idea pass you by. If you see something and you think that’d make a great book! Write down a note right then because later you are sure to forget and it could have been your best seller. Accept now that not everyone is going to love what you write. Prepare yourself for controversy, opinions and ideas from others but never give up faith. All it takes is for one right person to love whAt you’ve written to bring your work into the light for others to enjoy. Write for passion, for fun and for yourself. When you are satisfied, then share it with the world.
Several auto install utilities available which are very popular among the users.
Cabbage gives crunchy effect to the vada and you don't even realize you are eating cabbage until the cook tells you.
Aunt Amanda is getting old! Yesterday she turned 24 YEARS old, and I’m only 8 MONTHS old. I can’t imagine someone living that long, and you know what? My mom is even OLDER than Amanda! She better not die before me.
Allow me to start over.
The word "toilet" is, of course, another way to make sure your audience will enjoy your story.
Hi, my Name is Renee Greene, but you can call me "reneegede." I hear that if you can find the one thing in life that you would do for free if you could afford to, it is the thing that will call your name for the rest of your life. As a journalist since 1984 and professional writer and social media activist blogger since 1995, I have written hundreds of news articles and reports, interviewed a few celebrities, and written several books, including a book of haiku poetry, two exposes on politics in the south and in the black church, one of self-discovery, one on maintaining spirituality in a world that encourages self-doubt, and an autobiography of my childhood growing up in a small town in Georgia during the Civil Rights Movement and thereafter.
- Pablo Picasso
to my self I say.
It goes on:
The album is a ripper to say the least, featuring upbeat rockers like "Tall Girls" and their stellar anthem, "Rock Fever." Vocals bring to mind Danzig on the ballad-like "Flames Across The Sky" and Richard Hell on the chorus of "Pigeon Hole Wankers." It was released on the band's own Owl Records in an edition of 1,000 copies and evidently sold out very quickly besides a small, now-dwindled band member stash.
So why is he practically invisible despite being an undisputed legend doing some of his best work? Don’t we usually celebrate the Jay-Zs and Eminems of the world when they drop a great album? Isn’t that part of why we mark every anniversary of the tragic murders of Tupac Shakur and Biggie Smalls? Cuz we wonder what might have been, shaking our heads in the silence of their never-recorded classics.
Rodenbach
my husband created a slideshow for my grandfather, which was viewed during his wake. We gave copies on disk to a few people (my aunts and uncles mostly we didn't have time to make very many) and created a drop box file. And then my husband uploaded it onto youtube - and I'm not sure how my grandfather would feel about that. He's the sort that was only in the paper in his wedding announcement, his promotions at work, and his obituary. I'm not sure that he would want to join the "reality show" entertainment craze. But I do think that it will make him chuckle that Edward Mulhare (the actor) and Edward Mulhare my grandfather (two different people) are likely to confuse the heck out of viewers on Youtube.
It’s no coincidence that so many of the animals on this list also happened to be threatened, vulnerable or endangered species. Sometimes part of what makes the animal so cute — a wealth of fluff, for example — is exactly what makes the animal so appealing to other industries, like the captive pet industry or the fur industry.
We were living in a tiny temporary apartment in Seattle, and house hunting in our spare time. Every time I thought we had found *the* house, my husband found a reason to hate it..... Finally, we realized it wasn't the houses he hated -- it was the idea of living full time in a city. He felt like living in the middle of a giant city was killing his soul, so he presented me with a plan: We could live in a more rural area and he would travel into the city a few days a week for meetings, but work from home during the remainder of the week. I wasn't crazy about the idea, but I am crazy about the ocean, so when my husband suggested buying a beach house he won me over.
Malt:
You've rarely slept in your crib recently. You fall asleep in daddy's arms in our bed and sometimes I can get you in your crib for a few hours, but you seem to be spending most of your time in our bed. We're okay with that. I will feel better when we're in our new bed and not our dangerous platform bed though.
Whether I liked the revelation or not (and again, I’m cool with it), Moffat deploys it beautifully in the episode. At the start of the episode we have a really fantastic sequence where the Doctor is showing up in the TARDIS to call in favors in order to build his “army” to rescue Amy and her baby. Rory shows up at Stormgate to collect River, but she refuses to go.
Eva (Tilda Swinton) wasn’t always so ambivalent. As a travel writer, she can remember some pretty transformative, ecstatic experiences; she’s not given to depression. There was that one time when she crowd surfed during that tomato festival, when she and everyone else was drenched in smashed tomatoes. You have to look carefully at first to see whether she’s hysterical or elated.
I'm still not in permanent work but I am in long term temp work at the research council which although precarious is okay. My days are shorter than when I was at the chemist . The pay isn't as good but it's a nice environment and down time is good.
Hope to see you out & about,
8.William Morris (1834-1896) – crafts and arts specialist who dreamed of improving the quality of life for British workers. He was a highly successful artist whose designs are still around today – the message is? Leaving a legacy and putting something back!
It would follow then that I've become aware of two more recent vocal trends. One is mostly manifested on the television - specifically on political talk shows - and the other is everywhere, especially where young adult women gather.
where blood soiled the ground.
RiPPER…. : TALiON AGAiN!
I thought this would be a good time to tell you guys how thankful I am that you read this blog and for your sweet comments and emails. It's so wonderful to have such a great community of bloggers to share big (and little) news with. I really appreciate your encouragement and support! Thank you, thank you, thank you!
It was made by paper piecing.
Her daughter, María de los Angeles Verón, is believed to have been kidnapped and forced into prostitution, becoming one of the millions of human trafficking victims in the world.
Imagine me listening to this person talk and hearing sounds in the background and going (to myself, of course), "Huh? What's that? No. Noooooooooo! You're kidding me. Ack!"
“I can think of three violations: a) speech violations, b) association violations, c) the right to petition the government for a redress of you grievances. What good is free speech if the people in the government are so far away from you that they can’t hear you?”
What's that thing in the sky? The giant yellow thing? It's awfully bright even as I type I am wearing my shades to protect my poor eyes from the relentless glare. And I'm not sure if it's coincidence or not but since it's started showing up - a week or so ago - I've suddenly felt quite perky. It seems to be having a similar effect on the birds who are making a right royal racket. If I tune my ears into birdspeak it sounds like a thousand chirrups looking for sex.
Another family outing we had while Granny Carol was visiting was at Wonder Boy's request. Dude, we went bowling! Which I have done maybe once or twice before in my entire life. And let me tell you -- I SUCK at bowling. I went the first 8 rounds (spares? innings? I'm not even sure of the terminology) without hitting even one pin. Zip zero nada. Then Pod offered a little guidance in holding the ball correctly (heh heh) and guess what? I rolled a strike! And then I hit another 3 pins or so before the game, mercifully, ended. Pod is surprisingly good at bowling, and Wonder Boy came in second, although I suspect he is in for a cruel surprise when he has to play his first game without bumpers. Her Majesty even played, setting the ball down on the lane and shoving it so that it would make a lengthy, slow roll down to the pins.
Only you can let it in
Step 4: Place a black shimmery color in the outer v and then blend out.
Meanwhile, adult stem cells avoid the controversy surrounding embryonic stem cells but have a limited capacity to form other types of cells. The results of using these adult stem cells for tissue regeneration are “not as satisfying as one would like,” Dzau said.
But was any of this true? Had Vincenzo and de Valfierno indeed collaborated, making the theft a blindingly well-executed crime? Nothing was ever established, Vincenzo was hailed as a hero in Italy and let off after serving a mild sentence.
She just found that gear marked "Maximum speed" and took off.
1. I don't know about you, but some days my hair just doesn't like to cooperate with me and no matter what I do it just doesn't like to fall right. For those days something like THIS pretty floral snood would be perfect for covering up your unruly locks into a fashionable 'do!! Found over at GARLANDS OF GRACE's shop.
Simon has also touched a lot of children who have written to me about her. A common theme seems to be – hey if a chicken can raise funds for a playground, I wonder what I can do.
I see how Pinterest can easily become an addiction and one would lose track of time on that site, whew. For me, I think it will end with that contest entry due to our internet connection. Pinterest is not dial up connectivity friendly, at least with ours: nothing wants to load. It works great using the mobile broadband plan - except that it eats up the limited usage far too quickly. So for now, unless I am out somewhere with free WIFI, I won't be pinning :(
2) My husband, son and I went strawberry picking yesterday. I didn't even know there was such a farm where we live but after doing some research, there was one only about 30 minutes away! I was ecstatic, especially since strawberries are my favorite fruit, snack, dessert...pretty much anything.
Erik Brynjolfsson and Andrew McAfee study information-­supercharged workplaces and the innovations and productivity advances they continually create. Now they have turned their sights to how these IT-driven improvements affect employment. In their new book, ­Brynjolfsson, director of the Center for Digital Business at MIT’s Sloan School of Management, and McAfee, its principal research scientist, see a paradox in the first decade of the 2000s. Even before the economic downturn caused U.S. unemployment to rise from 4.4 percent in May 2007 to 10.1 percent in October 2009, a disturbing trend was visible. From 2000 to 2007, GDP and productivity rose faster than they had in any decade since the 1960s, but employment growth was comparatively tepid.
M is bullet mass (denominated in either in grains or grams). V is the bullet velocity (in either ft/sec or m/sec) The constants 450400 for american measurement, and 2000 for metric measurements, are the conversion factors for the dimensional analysis.
Here is a picture thought I'm sharing with you:
As for me, I still keep and prize what was revealed to me
Their reality so different from ours.
I was pretty sure I was going to be sent to the Principal's office any moment.
Howevs, there was one item I could not ship via US Mail. See, I (ridiculously) promised that I would vlog a karaoke dedication to my giveaway winner.
My roommate has already been in to take pictures of the scene, which will surely be appearing on Facebook shortly.
“Cause of death?” says Liam, flipping on his flashlight and squatting down beside the body.
As I was want to do then (and am now) I leaped on to anything in the culture that referenced things I was familiar with. So a movie with "Flatbush" in the title was so provocative even for my then preschool-self, that I can still remember peppering my grandmother with questions about the movie that she couldn't answer.
sometimes silly,
Part of me wonders how my grandparents would've taken this, knowing this about as political as I intend to get? I could speculate, but then again, I'm sure it's come up over the course of our acquaintance that I think it's vanity to second-guess the dead. Not that it matters; I might collect a story and expose myself to something I might not have otherwise, and maybe I should be grateful for that.
Dr. Google really becomes a confidant through infertility (which I know is not the best) but your doctor is never available to talk to you! Infertility clinics are in such high demand that I strongly urge you, find a local support group if you are faced with infertility! I have learned so much from other woman in this position, they have set my mind at ease over questions about medicines and procedures when I’m in between Dr. appointments.
11. Draw big shoes on the ends of these two long oval shapes.
See you Wednesday!
Job Interview
The rain had not deterred the crowd, who were conscious that their friends and family were facing far more testing conditions back in KL.
So what happened to Lisa? Well, for one thing, there's evidence of creeping decline in the Germano disco-chronology, and, for me at least, her tales of dejection, uncertainty and woe eventually began to lose their appeal. I can’t say that Lisa’s lyrics became farcical or myopic over time (her subject matter never changed), I just didn't relate to them personally anymore. It’s as if she got stuck in her own discomfort zone and invited everyone to join her there, then decided she didn't like the company. What once was self-deprecation became self-pity. Loyalist that I am, I responded by attempting to tune out the lyrics to her new songs and focus solely on the music instead. That didn’t work (and it never does): Lisa's trademark mix of creaking parlor recording and studio-created sound collage now appeared increasingly dull and indistinct. Look no further than 2003’s dreary Lullaby For Liquid Pig, in which, after a five-year recording hiatus, Germano returned with more of the ol’ mopey-dope (bizarrely, this particular dud was reissued in 2007 by infamous Rock Creep Michael Gira on his Young God imprint—just to piss me off further?). The humor is gone and she simply won't let you in; on this record the listener is left with nowhere to go but OUT. But I can take a hint. Here's hoping Lisa Germano will one day lose the funk and rediscover her creativity. Maybe she already has; In The Maybe World was released in 2006. I haven’t heard it.
So yeah! Morning everybody! I am going to leave and get dressed now…! Maybe I’ll post something after school..! See you next time!
It is recommended to either eliminate trans fats completely from your diet, or limit it to no more than 1% of daily intake. It’s great to finally see food manufactures being required to say how much of the trans fats are in their food. But be warned, they can legally put “0 trans fats” on their labels if they have less than .5g per serving. Which means since hardly anyone ever eats just one serving (another problem associated with overeating) and you are still ingesting trans fats!
Whatever the reason for the appeal, Kennedy's still got it. Note this photo taken during the summer of 2011 at Arlington National Cemetery. It depicts the crowd at the graves of the President and Mrs. Kennedy and two of their children. Not many other graves -- if any -- get this kind of attention, even at Arlington.
Will have to go back soon for weekend lunch or dinner!
Cue soap opera organ music: When I was six, I caught German Measles. It attacked my spinal fluid and turned into Encephalitis. I was in a coma for a week and blind for two days after I woke up. It took me a few weeks to fully recover. Yes, I’ve heard all the brain disease jokes, thankyouverymuch.
One missed available until as soon as the burial!
Don't let comparison steal your joy or the joy of others, in running or in life. Support others. Lift up others. Be inspired and encouraged by others. Inspire and encourage others. Find JOY in your own special journey, your life, your dreams, your blessings, and your accomplishments, and find joy in the lives, journeys, dreams, blessings, and accomplishments of those around you.
There is an important article in The Atlantic (May 2012) called “Is Facebook Making Us Lonely?” that lends tremendous perspective on information technology, social media and our relationships.
Sensei Frank shouted for a bit at the end of class, and then instructed us that at the end of every class we would form a line and shake his hand. While we shook hands, we would shout at each other. A line quickly formed, and I somehow found myself in the very back. When at last my turn came around, I hobbled up to Sensei Frank and feebly slapped his hand with mine, crippled as I was with trying to hide my blood stains. He finally managed to grab my hands and shook them vigorously, shouting nonsense in my ear as I cringed back in pain, and then he suddenly stopped.
But I did think it could be cool to keep with the same idea and do some molding along the lines of what I did in the playroom:
By then, he says, the theory of evolution put forth by Charles Darwin 150 years ago will be dead.
silently picking away
January is the month to do those projects that are less critical. Once March arrives the olive trees take priority, throughout spring and summer, until the harvest finishes in early December. Even though we have lived here for over ten years there is still so much more I would like to accomplish with the garden and the orchards. When we bought this property the 50 acres had long been abandoned and while there were many established trees, they had been left to their own devices and not cared for properly. The fruit orchards further away from the house have been left untouched since we brought the property - for no other reason than we had to prioritise. The olive grove came first, then the garden and the apple and pear orchards closest to the house. It sounds like so little when reduced to a few words here but the establishment of the gardens and fruit groves have taken years of hard labour and emotional energy.
B: After this was established, everything was cool.
Washington’s face,
Final Price:As low as $5.99 after coupon & ECB
The latest piece of shit to betray his fellow soldiers is a little 21-year-old goat-lover, Pfc. Nasser Jason Abdo, who was arrested by police in Killeen (Texas) today.
By nature’s arrangement the material body is given to the living entity for his suffering or enjoying. Different types of bodies are acquired for different purposes. The body of a tiger is made for killing and eating raw meat. Similarly, the hogs are made in such a way that they can eat stool. And as human beings our teeth are made for eating vegetables and fruits. All of these bodies are made according to the work done in past lives by the living entity. Our next bodies are being prepared according to the work which we are now doing, but in the previously quoted verse Śrī Kṛṣṇa indicates that one who knows the transcendental nature of His activities becomes free from the reactions of activities. Our activities should be such that we will not again become entangled in this material world. This can be made possible if we become Kṛṣṇa conscious by studying Kṛṣṇa, learning of the transcendental nature of His activities, and understanding how He behaves in this material world and in the spiritual world.
The story of how the rSogn came into existence has become almost legendary in bikey/internet circles, as apparently Sean asked for feedback in an open forum and tweaked the specs based on popular suggestions.
She’s a paper doll
Kennecott Copper Mine. This is one of the world’s largest mines that can be seen from space. This is a very interesting site to check out in Utah.
- a number of significant players are already seeking such high-spec commercial accommodation here and more will do so in the short and medium-term;
He is thee absolute best husband ever
Burden and Atlantic Yards
There was shot putter Valerie Adams (NZL) who became the second farthest shot putter of the New Millenium– in an event where the all-time list is dominated/polluted by the drug ravaged 70’s & 80’s – on her way to an undefeated season and World gold. There was distance runner Vivian Cheruiyot (KEN) who won both the 5000 & 10,000 in Daegu and became the #3 performer all time in the 5000 during the season. And there was Sally Pearson (AUS), gold medalist in the 100 hurdles, who became the #4 performer all time in Daegu.
I was exhausted after pulling an all-nighter and giving birth, but also so high on life that I couldn't sleep. I felt dreamy and giddy and wanted to soak up every moment with Toby.
oil the bowl and form the dough into a ball. cover the dough with the oil and cover with plastic wrap and let dough rise in a warm place for 45-60 mins or double in size.
thanks again from the MITM & me!
See those? Those are seeds. They're next to my bed. They are sprouting, as I write this. It's worth the incovenience to getting in and out of bed to have these there. They are becoming amazing seedlings and micro-greens. You know why??? Because spring is coming! Yes, indeed it is, and we are excited about it. It's not here, yet, and in Utah, it may be late April or so before the snow completely stops, but the signs are there.
That Frances Farmer, what an enigma.
so much smaller in leaf and twig,
Now that I’ve identified a few more shops to visit I’ll see if I can try a few more from the book.
But these days the closest I get to good acting is my two-year-old, who swears up and down that her older sister is to blame for everything, even when caught red-handed. She lies through her teeth and looks at me with her chocolate-brown eyes, framed by a curtain of long, dark lashes; she never looks away. It’s almost as if she believes her own lies. Almost.
for example, someone has a pair of socks on there under the title 'Justin Biebers Socks' now that is weird in its own right but reading through the description not only are they second hand socks, but they are from a guy who lives in England, called Justin Bieber!!!!!! not the tiny, squeeky voice teen singer but sum random guy whos jumping on the bandwagon. What was more shocking is that they already had 2 bids on them and were up to £3 haha some people!!
I’m not promising anything.
From the ESPN recap: “That’s a bunch of fake juice, coaches trying to get their players going because it was a pretty close game,” (Ryan) Stamper said.
The show was not animated in high definition, despite airing in 2009. This becomes incredibly apparent when you view the screencaps of this upscale. Q-tec’s new technology, F.O.C.U.S. did what it could, but they went from the DVD masters, which didn’t have the best quality. It’s not the worst upscale I’ve seen, but it’s certainly not one you’ll want to show screencaptures of. I’ve included 16 screencaptures from the first few episodes and the OP/ED for reference. It does look much better in motion though.
Other than that, Storyboarding and Visualising for the advertising business is keeping a roof over my head for the time being.
A mere day before the Keoish privateer Lydia's Light arrived back at the marooning isle, Osprem's Kiss had stopped by at Rennaud's request. He was worried about the offensive, marooned noble Lord Ronaldo Key and convinced Captain Cassidy to check on him before making port in Narisban. A search party consisting of Skullbreaker, Sasha Dirk, Half-Pint Moira and couple of Ospremites guarding the sage Olfon Trebus found the sea cave containing the body of Lord Key. After slaying an ambushing four-armed girallon with relative ease (Olfon shot it in the eye with a crossbow), they investigated Key's cave. All of Lord Key's possessions were gone including his shoes and Sir Aris' silver owl necklace which had led to his marooning in the first place. Marked on the wall of the cave, they discovered a cryptic message left by Key (which had incidentally been overlooked by Henri and Pickles):
Clothes- You are growing out of your clothes quickly. You've pretty much outgrown all your newborn clothes (there a still a couple things I can squeeze you into) and there are a few three month items that are even getting snug. You have long legs and some of the pants are getting a bit short. You wore your first pair of jeans last weekend and I will probably start putting shoes on you soon.
It was the week of our school's annual school camp, and we were up in the mountains enjoying ourselves and having a great time. Early on the morning of the eleventh, we were making our way to the chow hall when I kept overhearing talk of something terrible happening in New York. The adults were talking in hushed tones and being the carefree, unconcerned eleventh grader that I was, I just figured that they were talking about some incident that happened decades ago. Then that horrible loudspeaker above the chow hall enterance began to pump out media headlines of a plane crashing into the World Trade Center. None of us could believe what we were hearing. Immediately, we all began to panic. The first thing that came to my mind was that America was under attack. Were they coming for us way up here in the mountains?!! As much as they could, our teachers and counselors began to try to calm us down, but there was little they could do. Several of the men that were volunteering at the camp were in the military and had to rush to report to base. What was going to happen? What were we going to do? Are we safe? We were all just a bunch of kids stuck up in the mountains of Washington with no contact with the outside world and no mom or dad to tell us that everything was going to be okay.
Who is the worst blogger ever?! ME!
13-If you were granted three wishes from an angel or genie what would you want?
So why did I run away two nights ago?
Row 10: Sc dec over two sc. Finish off.
I got complacent, I was informed,
and i suppose i still don't,
I know I’ll find my new life. I know each day will have it’s ups and downs.
Wyeast 3711 French Saison 1.5 qt starter
Visit www.edvest.com for more information!
Bake for 50-60 mins or until top of cake is puffed quite high, has turned brown and a knife comes out clean. If the pudding browns too quickly, turn the oven down or even off and leave inside for the full cooking time. Transfer to cooling rack and cool to room temp.
SOL is the one who leads BIG BANG’s song with his smooth vocal, and talented to collaborate with various artists.
We also did some bird-watching, although again, not having an European bird book, it was definitely on the Watching end of things rather than Positive Identification.
Hartikainen-Sorri AL, Sorri M. Occupational and socio-medical factors in preterm birth. Obstet Gynecol 1989; 74: 13-16.
The truth is that entering the gallery, you get a nice, safe gallery opportunity to encounter paneling on the walls and pornographic neons (safe and gallery are almost always synonyms). You enter a makeshift trailer park hallway into exhibition space turned redneck mansion. There is a painting of fire and another of a Trans Am on lightboxes. Inside sits more paneling, a bar with Jack Daniels and tip bucket no doubt soon to double as a spittoon. Behind the bar, nothing less than two pinup bartenders complete with shit kicker boots.
The possibility that prosopagnosics can be (incorrectly?) identified as cases of autism was demonstrated in a story about prosopagnosia from the Australian science television series Catalyst which was broadcast in 2007 (see link below). An anecdote about two children in a family which was later found to have members with developmental prosopagnosia, who had previously been diagnosed with autism, was recounted by a prosopagnosia researcher from Macquarie University and dramatized on the show. I should point out that neither of the face perception tests shown in this story are the CFMT. One face recognition test shown in the Catalyst story uses the faces of famous people and it relies upon the person being tested already knowing about the famous person and being able to give a name for the famous face, two tasks which are not face recognition, so as a test of face recognition it is far from pure and perfect.
Or on a spoon.
So I studied my bicycle map for the Day 3, and chose a more western route towards Catholic University, along Michigan Avenue. That was much better, though there was traffic on Michigan, there was a sidewalk available, and no pedestrians. It's where I took this picture, with the pretty golden Fall leaves. I hang a left on First Street which takes me towards downtown and is a one-way street. When I get to R Street, there is a nice and popular bike lane that brings me to my office. It was kind of nice to, at times, find myself surrounded with other fellow commuting bicyclists, some in bike garb, but a lot just in their office clothes. I felt like I was in Copenhagen! :)
In other words: I think a story like Bert Blyleven -- a story where the writers slowly but surely come around to appreciating his greatness -- is not sad but triumphant. I think a story like like Lou Whitaker, who fell off the ballot so fast nobody ever really got the chance to talk about him, is the sad one.
And you’re wondering if you’ll survive
Posability: FE 7, RID 9
So, that is a recap of my Saturday night and basically my entire Sunday, which consisted of recovery and work. The bright spot of my terribly hung over morning was that i won a $5.00 gift card to Caribou from a drawing at work. WHoo! Caffeine never tasted so good as when its free!
The Geauga County Maple Festival is held on beautiful Chardon Square and opens on Thursday of the last full weekend in April. The festival celebrates the production of maple syrup, a leading agricultural industry in Northern Ohio.
Interestingly, the announcements on Proton’s seemingly imminent sale — and even the likely buyer — are coming from Dr Mahathir, who is an adviser to Proton, rather than its major shareholder — Khazanah, which has been rather quiet throughout the episode.
I do, however, have this blurry photograph of my paternal grandfather, Howard Mathis Wilson in some type of scout uniform. Grandpa was born 12 Apr 1909 in Bonnie, Jefferson County, IL so I'm guessing this picture would have been taken about 1919-1920. I don't have any information about Grandpa's scouting experience, but he looks quite serious and is using the proper three finger salute.
Answer: Yes.
Score: 3 / 5
It begins each morning, after 11 hours of sleep. They log onto the computer for their daily dose of online shopping: Toys Backwards R Us, Amazon, Foot Locker online, Game Stop online... Decisions are made. Items are listed. Virtual shopping carts are filled.
Cushion capital. Also called a block or cube capital. A Romanesque and Byzantine capital cut from a cube, with its lower parts rounded off to adapt it to a circular shaft; the remaining flat face of each side is generally a lunette. (A lunette is a flat, semicircular surface.)
Breeze Harper
Of dirt and grime
Well, we have stocked up on so many NEW and EXCITING products from CHA last week. Some products are in stock now and shipping while others are on their way to the Embellish IT! store and available for pre-order now!
2006: 750 deaths
This is not the first time we have seen such an incident. In November last, a rogue Afghan policeman killed five British troops. In December, an Afghan soldier also shot dead one US soldier and wounded two Italian troops at a base in Badghis.
Rain: I thought the intro posted here by the site was boring so I’m changing it. Senna will probably add to this later so no worries. Hmmmm. There is not much to write here in all fairness. Not at this point anyway. If I come up with anything I’ll keep you posted. ( Get it posted, this a post? Hahaha. Yeah. That’s not funny, which means I’m tired so I’m gonna go relieve my sleep deprivation)
“He knew that when he kissed this girl, and forever wed his unutterable visions to her perishable breath, his mind would never romp again like the mind of God. So he waited, listening for a moment longer to the tuning-fork that had been struck upon a star. Then he kissed her. At his lips’ touch she blossomed for him like a flower and the incarnation was complete.”
subtle, beyond all conception.
1977-01-12
T2/09 Email disclosure
I recently got a call from a good friend of mine from Eunice.
"I'll take them," I said to the social worker. "They can come home with me. Both of them. Together."
Notice especially the first verse, how it is filled with praise to our Lord! Until this past week though, I never had heard the story of the man who penned those lyrics.
Just not on your site, right Miro?
3.) What’s the best advice you can give to aspiring writers?
** A great thing about this stew, it is very adaptable. If you wanted to add additional vegetables like yellow squash, you could do that. Want to substitute cubes of chicken in for the Italian sausage? Go for it!
When we first moved to our farm, we spent some time visiting other churches. One Sunday we visited a Beachy-Amish Mennonite church. We did not know what to expect, and found ourselves in a church where the men and women sat on opposite sides, singing was a cappella, and the women wore plain dress and head coverings. After the service, we were invited back to the home of one of the families for a meal. I spent my time in the kitchen with two sweet, gracious, women.
Beat in the eggs, bananas, sour cream, vanilla, baking soda and salt, scraping down the bowl as needed. Turn the mixer down to low speed, and slowly add the flour, scraping the bowl as needed. Pour batter into greased loaf pan.
So the picture is set. There I am, standing on the rocks with black three-quarter pants on, a black and white summer shirt covered (thank goodness) by a black jersey and bright green slip-slops on my feet. I have a straw hat on my head and a packet with bucket and spades for the kids in case they get tired of swimming. Before me is the crossing, only knee deep and all in the timing.
History Buzz February 10, 2012: Peniel Joseph: Stetson University presents civil rights / social justice lecture by historian History Buzz February 10, 2012: William C. Harris & Elizabeth D. Leonard: 2012 Gilder Lehrman Lincoln Prize Awarded Books That Explore Lincoln’s Relationship with Border States, Jag Joseph Holt White House Recap February 4-10, 2012: The Obama Presidency’s Weekly Recap — President Obama Hosts Second Annual White House Science Fair & Hails Housing Agreement with Banks over Mortgage Fraud & Abuses Full Text February 10, 2012: President Barack Obama’s Speech Announces New Policy Compromise on Contraception Health Plan Coverage Rule
6. Michael Muller, Chung King Project: Muller seems as at ease thinking about the New York School of painting as he is with Tibetan meditation. Such an elegant, quiet show, one drawing of a night sky took him four months to complete.
Leave the bed and the fire,
But I feel like I’m on to something. My priorities are no longer a list. They sort of resemble a horribly imagined planetary system where everything else revolves around the most important piece. I’m pretty sure if I handed this in to a teacher, I’d get a gold star.
“Our specialty!” said the clerk. “Which would you prefer, the full-bodied German bud or something less expensive?”
It has happened me number of times. Whenever I tell people that I am from Kashmir, some take it as the famous ‘Kashmir’ of Led Zeppelin. Some other fight in their minds to understand how I could come from a sweater (cashmere). Libya has been another favorite country, wherefrom people think I come from. Reluctant Pakistani claim is also there. Middle-east also hovers around, as some people try to converse with me in Arabic.
a pinch of salt - optional (use if using unsalted butter)
much fun we had with our monthly blog hop last week. Now for this weeks challenge, We are challenging you to make a card showing off flowers. This could be DP, images, flowers, brads anything you want to do to put flowers on your card. For inspiration you are playing for this fabulous stamp set from Mark's Finest Papers, a Heinrich Co.
decline in the quality of our
5And upon her forehead was a name written, MYSTERY, BABYLON THE GREAT, THE MOTHER OF HARLOTS AND ABOMINATIONS OF THE EARTH.
We went for peace to no avail; for a time of healing, but terror
I can't promise you perfection, because I don't possess it, everything that I have, every smile that passes my lips, every twinkle that visits my eye, every sparkle, every shine, You've given to me.
Flowering period: June to August
You may think that only parts of the development process are parts of this search, but doing so will limit the effectiveness of your searching. For instance, if you arbitrarily decide that a particular feature is what your customer wants and you then spend a huge amount of time talking to your customer base about the requirements for that feature, you are limiting your search to the various ways to do that feature, but what if the perfect implementation of that feature is only worth $10? You are then searching within a low value set of possibilities. Before you dive in too deep, spend a fair amount of time at a high level so as to maximize the value of searching at the next level down.
Those of you who have read Bancroft know that anger is not the abuser’s real issue, and therefore anger management strategies are like water off a duck’s back. In fact, they can even give an abuser another excuse — his anger, and whatever it is that supposedly made him an angry man.
Settle down.
i really want to get a body bugg or gowear fit...maybe for a reward...hummm.
I added a little loop of ribbon to the back, and attached it with some more foam tape.
The Hawks have two investigators probing Malema while Public Protector Thuli Madonsela has three. Madonsela’s spokesman, Oupa Segalwe, said their investigation into Malema’s business interests was ongoing.
Yesterday morning, the inhabitants of Sydney could observe such a fantastic picture.
Susanna is offering to give away a free copy of Minette's Feast. To enter your name in a drawing to win a free, signed copy of Minette's Feast, please email Susanna with the subject line "Minette's Feast giveaway." One entry per person, please. Winners will be selected at random on May 31.
Tim Holtz will be teaching at Stamp Asylum April 21st and 22nd. Obviously we will have to hold this event at another location to give as many an opportunity to attend these workshops. Due to time constraints we do not have samples or pictures of the samples.
The driver asked if I new the place
Dead out.
Anyway, thats enough waffle, the script has been wrote, storyboard is finished, costumes have been created, all thats left is to shoot it.
Next, we had a lovely Easter here at my house. The kids were each very happy with their gifts. Ruth got the movies “War Horse” and “Twilight: Breaking Dawn, Part 1″ which she was really happy with. Austin got an air pump BB Gun and we had a discussion about targets, safety, and all sorts of other things. Tara got a WHOLE bunch of “Hello Kitty” things and she was pretty happy with them all. Then they all got “The Muppets” for their joint gift and of course, they were pumped about owning that! We also had a day with Tara alone as she went to Wal Mart to the eye doctor and we now have a second child that is going to be using glasses. Apparently she hasn’t been able to see the Smart Board at school all year long, so we have them on order and should be able to pick them up before our Spring Break is over.
Shake, Shake, Shake Your Hands!
"In addition, the lawsuit says what I believe to really be the case: this isn't an ESDC project, this is a Ratner project; and ESDC has just handed over the entire keys to the kingdom to Ratner to do what he wants," Butzel said.
Journalists Union of North Malaya
Monday - Goth fixes the important bits and decides that home is a safer place to be
The other advantage to whipping up your own hummus is the price. A small tub of store-bought hummus easily goes for $5. Your own? Much less. The priciest item is the jar of tahini, which lasts for many batches. The other items—lemon, canned or dried garbanzo beans, hot sauce, garlic—are quite economical. Homemade hummus can be tweaked to your preferences. Like it chunky? Go easy on the food processor. Silky smooth? Add more liquid and blend away. Spicy? More Tabasco. Enough garlic to ward off the Twilight trilogy? Add a few cloves. You get the idea.
I see this sort of journalism as so unbelievable irresponsible and it seems to me that this attitude is generally accepted even by people who are liberal. And it all seems to stem from this idea that the evil corporate giants, in this case the pharmaceutical companies, are involved in this mass conspiracy to get people to use their drugs.
This is the concern. Exploratory drilling companies are being granted licenses to drill (just look at Blackpool for an example) across the UK, before the possible chance of contamination of our communal drinking water can be explored and evaluated. Even ‘if’ our water companies ‘can’ filter out the possible contamination for the main centres of population throughout the UK, what’s going to happen to the people and businesses not on the main water supply network? Other people or parts of the environment that may be affected are:
Our Class Act blog challenge this month is to make anything but a card. Originally, though, it was more specific--make a scrapbook page. Since my brain was already in scrapbook mode, I decided to stay with that idea.
OK time for more packing. I don't know why I am packing so much stuff up when the movers are supposed to, I guess it just makes me feel more in control. Well, til later, y'all.
Fletcher and Peg Byrom
359And sure, if fate some future bard shall join
Happy New Year to all.
“Son, if it flies, floats or is described by word formed by the acronym of “for unlawful carnal knowledge”… Lease It.”
Well, Hiccup is riding Toothless and discovering the dragon hive...this is getting good...gotta go!
Or pass it around at work...
UNISON branches are rightly, in general, both cautious and cynical about this initiative - but then caution and cynicism are both essential requirements on any imaginable person specification for a branch official.
DJ Soko and Apollo Brown, both respectively of The Left connect with Detroit's Guilty Simpson and Rochester emcee extraordinaire and fellow Brown collaborator Hasaan Mackey..
HOW DO YOU HIDE THAT BLASTED TV?!?!
I promise, I will not do this often. I like the groove we’ve established. I will not squander what we’ve built together for random shoe whims.
We may very well hear a lot more about Daniel Wideman, and who else he can lure to the Lulu VIP stable, but what is clear is that this VIP publishing service is as much a part of ‘traditional’ publishing as a whole, as self-publishing is part of the publishing industry itself. There is a trade-off when two distinct worlds collide—wrapped in their own self-created identities, morals, structures and perceptions of what is right, whether allowed or even fair—as authors and publishers in this new world, we must ensure we are not so quick to place a label upon our identity or the platform of choice we assign our work to.
Final Fantasy VI 2
I have been of the opinion that in a marriage one of the spouses wanting to opt out, is reason enough to worry and ponder as to what could be done to mend the dent. But, his ego seems to be in pain cause he missed out on the privilege of telling a woman to go to hell.
I finally landed on these beautiful curtains from Pottery Barn.
I’m the detective up late
The one the first Thanksgiving the BH was living in Austin. Hosted my mom and four friends who were not traveling. The food was magnificent. I specifically remember having rhubarb pie for the first time, and loving it.
American police departments often are afflicted with obstacles that keep them from moving forward, Couper said. They include an attitude of anti-intellectualism and the idea no one can teach police chiefs about their own organization.
Phone 0191-5285536
PDF viewing and editing comes foremost for me, in terms of utility on the iPad. With so many books nowadays coming out in digital and dead-tree versions simultaneously, it's often a lot easier for me to just carry a tablet to my various games around the Ohio Valley, rather than lug books around. While I still love books while at my home table (and to read before bed!), the convenience of a PDF really trumps a book when elsewhere.
“He’s fighting against cultural Marxism and an Islamization of Norway and he found that the most rational … way to accomplish that was through terrorist actions on Utoya and in Oslo,” Forts said.
Make no mistake about it: The consequences of these choices are being seen now in all Western societies and it amounts to suicidal madness because such choices are a conscious denial of reality.
The banjo was custom-made for Kan by Brooks Masten (brooksbanjos.com). If anyone knows how to tune a 4-string banjo, fuck you.
After reading this, I would offer to clients that when they called me to say they were in labor, I could ask them, “OK, are we talking band aid pain, seeing Jesus pain, or eyes bleeding pain?” One client took me up on it and offered, “I don’t see Jesus yet, but I think that might be him about a mile away.”
Though the girls are at a boarding school, there are, apparently, one two types of classes and only two teachers: a class in biology and evolution taught by Mademoiselle Edith (Hélène de Fougerolles) and a class in ballet taught by Mademoiselle Eva (Marion Cotillard). The teachers are generally stern and serious with the girls, but they're also compassionate, and seem concerned for the girls' futures.
Video: One chance
*sputters*
Fourteen brands, 29.6 ounces of meat (that’s 1 hot dog per package, for those of you taking count, each split 3 ways). We decided to each eat only 1/3 of a dog per brand, because we aren’t Kobayashi “Tsunami” Takeru. Because we are purists, we ate them unadorned, making sure we introduced condiments on the second bite, if at all. Because we didn’t want to confuse the issue, at least for this initial roundup, all hot dogs were 100 percent beef, except one which was a bison/beef hybrid, and the other which was a beef/chicken hybrid. The intent of this is that hot dogs with pork, although standard for much of the country, are considered a very different thing around here (meaning the New York area) and thus will likely receive a different roundup at another time. All were grilled on a gas-fuel Weber with the simplest possible cooking method – no basting, no smoking, and we did not split the dogs, which we felt would not have represented what most people do on their grills.
Take your pattern piece and cut out the headband from the top (ruffled) and bottom (15" x 3" plain) pieces. The pattern piece I've given you is only half. Either cut on a fold or make a larger pattern with a file folder.
Copyright: Frances Lynn, 2006.
Slivers of opalescence from simplicity
Thanks so much to each of you who hopped along with us. I am sorry to be late in announcing the blog candy winner. The whole time the hop was going on we were out of town and I was doing everything by laptop on the road. We are home now and as my laundry is going I entered the numbers into the random.org machine and came up with
To get Google, Bing, and other search engines to notice a change in information as it is presented on the Web, the original site hosting that information must change. It doesn’t matter which site is the source. It could be Facebook, or a local blog, or a gaming forum. If it’s showing up in search results, it has little to do with the search engine and everything to do with the site of origin. Once that site has changed, then you’ll see a change in the search results.
Me: But who usually pays McGyver for this? The station?
His socialist legacy lives on on countless University campuses and political movements across the across the nation - even in the Oval Office itself.
Sometimes the need for praise is so strong, that the getting of that praise is the ultimate and only goal. Like a child who works hard to get the gold star at school, but forgets her work as soon as the star is given. There is no joy in the work, little value in the finished piece - but the star is taken home to gain further praise.
Toothpaste messes in the BR
But the idea that two people may love each other and want to commit their lives to each other and then are told they may not because of their gender seems to me inexplicable.
(If you would like to read my Open Letter, please read the previous blog post)
I was reading this week about David Simon and his dislike of internet TV critics. Now, David Simon is someone I respect artistically to a great degree. So his opinion made me take pause. But then I read this extremely well-presented article from Noel Murray over at The AV Club. Like him, I think my goal of this weekly review is really to talk about television, not ruin it. I want to know if other people feel the same way I do and to engage in conversation with them. I may not like certain episodes of TV, but I do watch the shows nonetheless, religiously for the most part. So, I hope I don’t harm anyone/thing by posting my feelings here.
1) Billi SanGreal: a kick-ass heroine who’s not just brave and strong, but also well trained and highly educated miles away from the image of an inactive princess waiting for her prince charming to make her happy. Are you trying to tell young readers something about the role of women in modern society?
These people with the BBC and The Arts Council became the new Establishment and promoted The Culture War from within. If a young playwright wrote about the destructive psychological effects which abortion can have on women Mr Stephenson would reject it. (1)
Waltham Pocket Watch Serial Numbers – Know Them
Seems there was a study that came out a few weeks ago, which came to the conclusion that unschooling does not "work" as well as either schooling or structured homeschooling.
“Crash diets can affect the hair cycle,” Mirmirani tells WebMD. “Losing a significant amount of weight in a short amount of time can affect that normal hair rhythm. Two to three months later, you might notice a significant increase in shedding. This is a temporary problem that you recover from with a well-rounded diet.” I’ve experience it first hand.
WG: Now your job. Where did you train?
I racked a Belgian Summer Saison to keg over the week. I've substituted hops on the recipe and there seems to be a bit of zing where it was normally smooth. I also put my Psychedelic Monk into a keg. I started at 1.098 and was at 1.018. The target was to finish out at 1.014. It's a bit sweet, but at 10.48% ABV already, I don't know if the yeast will do much. I'll wait another month or two. Time will only help smooth this one out.
Oh, I strayed. So why was Alexander considered to be gift from God? Well, mainly because his mom (the cunning Olympias who slept with snakes – Nancy, I hope you read this,) and his dad (who loved to get drunk and was an octa-wiferian) both had funny dreams when he was in his mom’s womb. In a manner of speaking, the rumor-mill of those days spewed rumors that Alexander was conceived through divine intervention. Poor Philip. He did all the hard-work, didn’t he?
The DWP’s version of events suggests that it was keen to push him off the committee even before he decided to leave. Farmer explains that officials had asked him to consider his position, concerned that a conflict of interest might be emerging, on the back of reports of imminent legal action by individuals with mental health problems against the government, over the fitness-for-work test.
Nope. I NEED MY COFFEE!
Ba baa, ba ba ba ba ba ba ba.
In retrospect, next time I brew this I will not use roasted barley. Maybe some pale chocolate, instead.
And fail-fail-failing. Oh, so hard.
Regardless of their sincerity or motive for propagating said message, Christ’s own words debunk and utterly destroy such a notion.
As an illustrator, I tend to work mostly with black lines, however, working in colored lines gives a softness to my work. Look at the mermaid header- although this was drawn with one of our disposable multiliners, the gray line is much softer on the eye than if I had drawn it with black.
For our family (group) time we’re using:
Team Home Runs: 145
Blown about by the wind, every time it spills over
Let's move on to the modern Easter celebration. It's weird, isn't it? Can any of you honestly tell me that it makes sense? Rolling eggs down a hill? What? Why? What possible reason is there to waste perfectly good failed chicken babies? I cooked my eggs this morning instead. I even went to Tesco this morning to make sure I had bagels and cream cheese in for an unforgettable Sunday breakfast. Sorry to anyone who has me on Facebook, you'll have already seen that joke but I only have so many.
Now that you just need to find fans that love having cricket records to be discussed during a tournament. Once cricket environment builds up, it's difficult for cricket has made people come out with cricket portals also give out information about your favorite bowler is performing and what they like and what his potentiality is. After all, live matches that take place in upgrading rules and regulations.
Love his farm name, Josh's Foraging Fowls, Wilcox Arizona
So it is that after getting on for 500 days of Hackgate, not a single Newscorp, police or government apparatchik has been so much as placed in an official dock…let alone tried. But when those at the bottom – badly parented thanks to mad social engineers, and rejected by the accountancy model of capitalist social responsibility – decide to torch neighbourhoods and steal things they’ve been told they should aspire to, 3,420 miscreants get caught, tried and imprisoned within weeks. (And of course, the media point out how far-Left elements were working these poor stupid people from behind. Which they are…but why does that excuse exclusion? It’s a result of exclusion isn’t it?)
5. Both vessels struck an iceberg in April.
And love … never arrives too late
Cut to a drunk Ga Young confessing her worries to Jae Hyuk. He’s not very happy to hear her confessions but doesn’t stop her. She tells him what Young Gul said to her when she said she wanted to leave- “Weren’t you and I supposed to be together till the end?” She came out without saying anything and chugging down another drink, goes on about how unfair things are and worries if Young Gul is very angry at her since he told Bong Sook not to talk to her. That makes Jae Hyuk burst out- Is she trying to test his patience here? She’s already rambled on for two hours and all she talked about was Bong Sook or Young Gul. That brings Ga Young to a pause in her drunken stupor, although she’s not much sober to register his temper. He gets up to leave and she tries to follow, but slips back onto the chair, drunk. Jae Hyuk helps her and supports her as he walks her out.
3. 2.x4 Spring Chick, Lamb and Bunny - Nothing says Spring like cute and fluffy animals and these 2x4 Spring Bunnies, Chicks and Lambs were AdOrAbLe!
This is a story of my day. I've written it from two points of view. Each story is written about the exact same events on the exact same day involving the exact same people. And each version is totally true.
This is a One-Guide-Fits-All (as long as you have the money) and accordingly all the actions and items have been designed and actually tested in real life (by those trained and certified in such things) to work with
But I’m not in a rush. And I do not want to be “skinny.”
I am currently reading Secret Life of a Prayer Warrior by Derek Prince. I have read a couple of books written by Prince but I must say this is my favorite one thus far. One specific chapter pertains to the blood of Jesus and how we must use it for our testimony. God has been telling me time and time again to not identify with the person I used to be. As long as I continue to identify with my old struggles and habits, I will continue to be in bondage to them. Now, I am not dismissing the fact that I still have struggles and strongholds but I have to declare and decree that I have been justified through His blood. It is one thing to identify what we used to be and the things we used to do but it is something completely different to accept becoming a new creature in Christ and leaving unnecessary baggage behind us,where it belongs. There is beauty in God revealing to us the places He has brought us from. Galatians 5:24 states: “Those who belong to Christ Jesus have crucified the flesh with its passions and desires.” From the time I first read this verse I have made it my mission to continuously ask God to help me crucify my flesh causing my carnal mind to completely die and be buried somewhere to never be found again. One of our goals should be to have our soul,body,and spirit into subjection to His Spirit. I am at a time in my spiritual growth where I have to distinguish thoughts inspired by the Lord and thoughts inspired by the enemy. As born again Christians, we have been redeemed and forgiven of our sins. If we continue to carry and dwell on past mistakes, we disregard God’s desire to make us righteous and just. We have to let go of the world and the things in it, conquering and crucifying our flesh. Keep in mind that there is power in the blood and God has given us the authority to use it. We have been bought with a price to be ambassadors for Christ. Below are some of the verses that were used in Prince’s book. I wanted to share these verses because I found them to be very helpful and even more comforting. Claim your adoption in the royal family in the name of Jesus Christ.
And I believe, if we have a big election with truly historic big choices, that we can defeat Barack Obama by a huge margin. But it won’t be by running just as a Republican. It will be an American campaign open to every American who prefers a paycheck to food stamps, who prefers the Declaration of Independence to Saul Alinsky and who prefers a strong national security to trying to appease our enemies.
I pray the One who Created you to "Soar Like and Eagle" will watch over each of you every day of a very long magnificent life. You are each loved and missed, but you will STAY FOREVER cherished in my heart!!!
I'm going to sell the painting that I did that hangs (hung) above my sofa. Its 36"x48", and it's $500. If the buyer is out of state, or out of driving range, they will also be responsible for shipping. The canvas is a gallery size canvas, and is painted on the sides of the canvas too, so there is no need to frame. Email me at kristen.fountain@gmail.com, if you want to purchase.
All I can say is I loved every minute of it. It is a sweetly intimate, simple story that is also very powerful. And the music, written by the two main actors, is fantastic (OMG! this song!). B declared it the best movie ending he had seen in as long as he could remember. I told him I would be a better person if I could watch a movie like that once a week. (Hey, we might have had some wine that night, what can I say?) I know for sure that I fell asleep that night thinking about it and woke up the next morning doing the same thing. Gah, I love when that happens.
She found the other woman's clothes in a closet, cut various items with a pair of scissors, put them in a suitcase and left it in the home's driveway, she told investigators.
Lots of creative and functional ways to use clothes…or they can just be fun.
.... Amanda Jane
but still use motivation on your way to bail
Sweet Mother is updated daily. If you’d like to follow this blog, you can do so by clicking the handy button at the top of the page.
Circle of Kindness - take a paper plate and draw pie pieces on it - draw pictures of those you are to be kind too (like those in your family), attach an arrow cut out of cardboard (use a cut up cereal/cracker box) with a brass fastener. Then just spin the arrow and see which person you can be kind to today. I thought when my child has a bad attitude, I can have him spin the arrow and in turn be kind to someone to try to get rid of the bad attitude. http://www.crayola.com/crafts/detail/circle-of-kindness-craft/
The raw meat smell of the blood wafted past Xu Guan’s nostrils. His stomach rebelled. Xu Guan tried to raise himself up onto his hands and knees but he was too late. Vomit involuntarily lurched past his lips and onto the cool, white tile floor. Splatters sprayed back onto Xu Guan’s face immediately inducing a second round of regurgitation. The small hospital meal, eaten only hours before, liquified and trailed across the floor in the direction of the pool of blood. Xu Guan’s stomach was empty but it continued to lurch as the stench of the mixing pools reached his senses.
Suggestions: The Marcio trade they’re obsessed with can definitely help them. But do they really that?
It was clear to me that what has been lacking in the movement up till now is, in a word, leadership. With the right charismatic leader, we can set new goals, reach new achievements in world brotherhood.
I just finished doing something I’ve actually never done before: I just powervoted for American Idol for 2 STRAIGHT HOURS. Why did I do this with my precious hours of free time? I’ll tell you why: It’s top 6 week.
There is a good reason I know nothing about Anders Breivik, the man who blew up a government building and shot 76 teenage Marxists in Norway. As part of its agenda to invent home-grown “right wing terrorism,” the CTC are trying to fit me up as being an associate of Breivik, whom I’ve never met.
There Are Cracks In The Quality of the History
And if you fail to see it
Today I thought, fuck being a writer, I should become a scholar or a performance artist. For a couple weeks things happened or were suggested they might happen and I thought - gosh, I might be a normal writer, with a career, that takes me places. These were all mirages. I would like to be a performance artist, and by that I mean I would like to make things that don't sell. I feel perhaps language is overrated. I would like to just stand in public and scream. I would like to unrobe myself and run through the street. I would like for language to be like a bomb. A dirty bomb. I would like to write of being a dirty woman.
We live in interesting times and that, of course, is the ancient Chinese curse.
Flower for Algernon – I felt it coming back – the process that usually takes a month or so to creep over me, fell like a heavy, wet, mouldy, blanket on my brain.
And, when it was over, we hugged and I told her what a blessing she has been to me through the years and wished her luck and much happiness in her new adventure. She promised to keep in touch and let me know where she settles to work in Austin......
Love you more.
It all started with an on-sale striped shower curtain I found at Target. Then I added a polka dotted one bought cheap on Amazon along with a navy paisley tapestry. And then I remembered that I had some navy & white polka dotted fabric that I used as a tablecloth for a Labor Day party I had when I first moved into my house. I added a few tarps and was set!
Or walk with Kings – nor lose the common touch,
The other day I was enjoying my last sweater and pants day, because I'm participating in Dressember! Check out the info here at my friend Blythe's blog, Blythe Hill. Join me! I know it's a cold month to be wearing dresses but that just makes it more of a challenge! I haven't posted up my pictures for the first day, or today, but I think I'll do a weekly recap. It'll be easier for me because it's hard for me to post on a daily basis.
The plaintiffs also seek compensation for their attorney's fees and expenses and the cost of litigation from MHUSD.
Here are a couple of my photos from St. John in the Virgin Islands:
We’ll write in regards to the genuine interests of our readers
the railway bridge, the cemetery
Five years ago next month, I began college (sitting in the roller coaster for the very first time). I expected the unexpected. Media, friends, family, and more media/society told me what to expect. Stereotypes of the college life. But I honestly did not know what was going to happen (the loops/upside-downs of the roller coaster)...until it happened. To spare the details, college was a time of fabulous memories, ones that I'm not sure I'd really want if I knew what I was getting into. If someone told me from Day One of freshman year that I was going to be involved in the most amazing college ministry, go to New York for mission trips twice, find my best friends, pull all-nighters, become an RA, move every year, have a Master's Degree at age 22, change majors, take the GRE, take Praxis exams, and write nearly ten trees worth of papers, I do not think I could confidently say, "Let's do this!" No, I'm an optimistic-realist. Not an optimistic-optimist.
No shipping methods were found for your address. Please edit your address to continue.
Hiya ...
My story recommendation of the week is for "The Man Who Bridged the Mist" by Kij Johnson, cover story of the October/November issue of Asimov's Science Fiction (cover by Paul Youll).
We also finally found the groucho-store! *__* (The store which sells LM.C outfits and stuff)
I believe in angels........
People keep asking if we’ll move out of the cottage after we’re married and I ask, why? Although I want to share our wedding with friends and family, our marriage will, I believe, be just between the two of us. I hope it will change nothing, but solidify everything.
in the eastern sky
I think, also, that I feel like keeping the rest of how I will look a bit of a mystery from the world-at-large, as well (because obviously, 8 kajillion people read this blog religiously!). If you want to see some of the photos from the try-on, let me know and I'll happily share, but I think I'd rather keep it a bit under my hat for now.
Yes…. I am contemplating subscribing to Mint also….
Momentum and energy don’t exist. They are made up tools to model things.
If you like hazelnut? Well, I'm still kind of iffy on this one. It's kind of thin and sweet, and the hazelnut's pretty up-front, on the verge of being over-powering. You'll probably want to try it for yourself.
Where do you store your alternative clothing items? Where do you store your costumes from Halloweens, conventions, or events? Is it easy or difficult to find the space? Do you have any storage tips to share?
Below is my entry for a competition by Penguin Books. The aim was to create a book jacket for Ken Kesey’s novel ‘One Flew over the Cuckoo’s Nest’. First of all, I will say that this has been a pretty useful experience as it has given me more of an idea of what working for clients might be like. Other than the dimensions and text to include however, this was a pleasantly open ended brief and I have simply created an image that reflects my own feelings with regards to the story. The view looks down a corridor in an asylum, the prominent setting in the novel, towards a broken window at the end which hints towards the famous ending in which Chief Bromden, throws the shower cistern through it. The second door on the right has a small stream of water coming from it to further indicate this event, but perhaps this is a little hard to realise on reflection. The presence of an empty chair facing the windows on the left wall is my attempt to gesture towards the feeling of longing that I personally took from the characters, especially Chief.
Eating can be so cute and fun..
But now, here I sit, 3 hours later… Horny as hell. And I’m trying to figure out where I can go in the house where no one will hear my wand. Because, although my libido is sated, I really want to touch myself. Not necessarily to cum, although I wouldn’t be complaining if I did, but just because. Because my hand is aching to do it. Rubbing around in the wetness, a mixture of his cum and mine. My clit is aching for it. Hard, I can already tell, wanting to be touched. Damn.
(Incidentally the neighbour's boy's mum now knows about the cat poo on carpet tile frisbee incident, which someone accidentally let slip the other day. The passage of time and a bottle of South African shiraz softened the blow, and she forgave him).
Dear Heavenly Father, I thank You for all my friends and loved ones and my fellow brethren in Christ Jesus whom You use to bless me. I thank You for their increase and prosperity; You’re causing them to move forward and make progress in every area of their lives, in the Name of the Lord Jesus Christ Amen!
It keeps
Bottom Left 2 - For this little canvas I painted it with acylic paint then coated it with Ferro Paste. I sprayed a stamp with water then pressed it into the paste and left it to dry. I sponged acrylic paint around the edge of the paste and decorated with micro beads and gems.
Health & Personal Care Stores
A teacher at General Smuts High School explained how protesters cut the school’s fence and trampled it to gain access to the property.
The woman existed, but the mother, never.
If you’re already serving a dessert course and wedding cake you could purchase bakery boxes and have the catering/location staff place one or two cupcakes in a box for guests to take with them as they leave. Remember, edible favors are always a favorite with guests!
And I'll probably talk about that next time, whenever next time is.
Apr 12, 1858:
The new year has come and I have failed to update followers of events in my life. I'm retired - I don't have to. Besides, I spend more time on facebook now.
Sigh. I'm trying to figure out what's going on with me, food and my body these days but sometimes it feels like I'm not making much progress. E and I will be doing a juice detox later this week so hopefully that will help to reset some stuff for me.
(1852 – 1933)
dancing to the wind,
Now this is not a boyfriend, this is not a lover, this is just a friend.
Nov 2000 Nebraska approves constitutional amendments to limit marriage to opposite sex couples.
Until, that is, a day or so later. I'm sitting in front of the box, eating my lunch, channel surfing when I stumble across the celebrity version of The Apprentice. So I ate, and watched, and before too long the credits start to roll. I'm about to grab the remote, turn off the TV and get back to work when whose name should pop up on the screen? Executive Producer - Eden Gaha.
Evo minutes before she decided to nick
So since Nike felt the old train logo didn’t work well on apparel because of the smoke, so they decided to come up with a new train logo that features smoke. Makes sense to me!
Setting the bike up with my preferred fit was almost fool-proof. The clamp for the aero seat post was simple to use and easy to adjust. Saddle setback was easy as well with a saddle rail clamp that adjusted simply and quickly. The front of the bike was more difficult. The S5 features a very tall head tube—nearly 18cm on the size 56cm bike I was on. There is an engineering reason behind this. The longer head tube allows for a dropped down tube, which smooths airflow from fork to frame and actually stiffens the front end as stresses are more easily transferred from the head tube to the down tube. Still, it made getting my preferred drop difficult to say the least. Even with the -17 degree stem I could not quite get my bars to the height I normally run them. For test riding purposes this was ok, but again, for a top-end race bike the fit should, in my opinion, err on the side of letting folks get low easily.
I'm still on vacation, so rather than posting a homemaking tip, I'm going to excuse myself and just post some skiing pics of the kids. Happy Holidays and thanks so much for your links and visits!
94. You Never Even Called Me By My Name -- David Allan Coe
This past Sunday, Lost ended. If that means something to you, you may be happy to be reading about the show on a website dedicated to the very best of film and (sometimes) television; if it doesn’t mean something to you, you may be tempted to skip over this post.
This is the worst of it.
A member of the National League of American Pen Women, as well as a Distinguished Alumnus of Evangel University, Lewis has written over 80 books for children, youth, and adults, many of them award-winning. She and her husband, David, make their home in Colorado, where they enjoy hiking, biking, and spending time with their family. They are also avid musicians and fiction "book worms."
I had a friend who used to write short stories almost everyday because that is what she dreamed about. I personally wish I had dreams that were good enough to write down for stories but unfortunately many of my dreams are pretty dull.
Splash of white wine
Confirmation update #5: Southwest Texas .. right at the border SW of san antonio .. seen in the HAARP ring shot from accuweather below is receiving Hail and Damaging winds now:
It wasn’t like her to stay angry this long.
57. Les McCann - River Deep, Mountain High (3:10)
I mean what great inspiration to maximize what you have and be comfortable and confident in that, rather than wanting what someone else has!
8 oz of Birch Beer (soda)
- if we don’t get the result we want, delusion sets in (man, this life sucks, are the bars open yet?!)
A few weeks ago Larry came over. He had been in the hospital and they were finally starting to work on the roof of the depot. Larry and Betty have taken pictures right along and now it was going to be too hard for him to go down and shoot some photos of the roof being restored. Would I be willing to shoot some photos for them? You bet! For the last couple of weeks or so I've driven down every couple days to take some photos to show the progression. So far I haven't let Rotator Cuff surgery stop me!
We met Jelly Boy at a bar in the winter of 2008. We hung out a lot drinking and talking about music. One day, the making of our EP was brought up and when we asked for his input, he said yes.
Lose weight and belly fat by careful dieting
Yes, I have been neglecting the blog a little bit this month, not on purpose really... I have just been trying to stay focused on daily plans and seem to run out of time every single day!
Sunday, 5 February: Girlie van Niekerk (62) was assaulted by two intruders. They also tried to strangle her. That attack happened at the Group 14 smallholdings outside Bothaville.
I am super giddy...little things that have happened lately that make my heart swell! I am so thankful and humbled too...for I know Heavenly Father is mindful of me..
And here below are the ATCs I made for the month of OCT 2011..... For the first ATC (India) held on THE Indian Craft Room....... :D
Who knitted thi face an dropped a stitch?
1 sorting
Which brings me on to the sound. The score is superb, wratcheting up the tension as you try and blast your way through another fire fight.
Luke: No, they clean bikes too.
In closing beloved, I beg you, I plead with you, on that day when we stand before almighty God our maker, DON’T BE WITHOUT EXCUSE.
Flowers aren't just for special occasions... to be plonked in a vase on a table... Flowers are for the every day and need to be prepared and arranged if they are to give of their best... I often buy myself a bunch if I am feeling in need of a pick me up... a little like a new lipstick... both small gestures but massively successful when it comes to the feel good factor...
was in the slightest
Yeah Yeah Yeah~
While these kids guitars were smaller, and looked like mini versions of regular guitars, that’s where the resemblance ended. They were made cheaply, making them affordable for parents to give their kids. However, that low cost came with a price.
This marks the end of the Costa Rica Photos! I hope you enjoyed them. I might post another every now and then, after all I took over 2,500 on that trip. Aside from that it’s back to Alaska!
Fascinating.
The USACE + SWPA have cut back flows over the last 24 hours, as Bull Shoals Lakes finally settles down to the bottom of flood pool.
Eileen's mother was blind therefore not knowing that her
The flavor is equally impressive. Lots of roast in the malty first note, but the hops are there, too. It has much the quality of a doppelbock, but the hops suggest something else. There's a pronounced caramelized note that comes through like brown sugar. What really lept out to me (though not so much to other drinkers, apparently) were the hops. No doppelbock has ever sported this kind of bitterness. It's by no means overwhelming (70 BUs in a beer this dark and strong isn't aggressive), but they are present and persistent.
Some 70 percent of the Tigers’ roster of scholarship players is comprised of freshmen or sophomores, a slight increase from 2011.
That makes our most
Coopersmith's Pub & Brewing Sigda's Green Chili
3.) What type of style do you go for in drawing?
Every election season, a variety of newspapers and other entities set themselves up as arbiters of the accuracy of politicians’ statements. These “fact-checkers” nearly always turn out to be liberal apologists who don a false mantle of objectivity in order to advance the cause of the Democratic Party. Maybe there are exceptions, but I can’t think of one offhand.
I dropped in after a long absence at Sushi 69 in San Anselmo. Hiro (Hiroyuki Makino), the Executive Chef and owner was smiling behind the sushi bar as always. He informed me that the other long time Chef at Sushi 69, Takeshi, is returning to Japan today, his last day behind the sushi bar being last Thursday, so I just missed him. And miss him I will. Takeshi, like Hiro, has a fine hand at slicing up the sushi so that it melts on your tongue and he sometimes made little variations that he thought would suit my taste.
I’m now going to say something that people who saw this movie will almost certainly disagree with: I didn’t think Tom Hardy’s performance was that great. The character is absolutely insane, little more than a talking animal. I’d think that what was required here was some kind of insight into this guy. I didn’t get that. It’s not all Hardy’s fault. Refn doesn’t seem to know the right points to bring this out. Still, there isn’t something bubbling underneath like Ryan Gosling in Drive. I’m not saying it wasn’t well done in parts and maybe even most of it, but this is the whole enterprise. It needed to be perfect. It was far from it.
Imagine then that this guy went to work in this state. What would you think? What if he worked in a safety critical organisation, or drove a fork lift truck for example. What would you think? If he ‘barfed’ all over your desk, what would you think? What if you had to increase your workload to cover for him while he sobered up. What would you think?
*I didn't do well this semester. I got a B and D in my two courses that I didn't drop. It brought my GPA down to a 3.4 so I'm doing another semester at Mountain View and I've got to get 4 As to bring it back up so I can get my transfer scholarship money. I'm not giving that up.
List 7 things readers might find interesting about me.
Sits a bird with her sight right-on
Currently as drafted, Protect IP only applies to foreign domains . This could potentially help rights holders because lawsuits concerning domains outside of the U.S. are usually timely and costly to pursue. On the other hand, critics note that “fair use” laws may not be the same globally and other nations may use a similar law to pull down content from American domains that would otherwise be protected in the U.S.
And then, a reprieve! Tim decided to throw open the last Friday before handover to one last almighty beer-driven funfest. One last chance to celebrate beer and food and fun and friendship to get really, really loud. Just the way a Beer Dinner should be. But it hasn’t always been like that.
The first one was a little blurry.
First, the authors:
Over four months of work and I have paid off 6% of my debt, have no savings, and have lost three pounds.
Please contact me at acerminaro - at- FixedFeeLegal -dot- com if your company is growing and needs a cost effective way to obtain contract, compliance and general business legal counsel.
Thank you Mom for showing us that there are times to ask for help.
And what about those sunglasses that keep getting lost…on top of your head?
A checklist of speech can always reduce the overload in the cockpit when you fly a complex flight simulator.
This information can be used to analyse the models that the paper covers, but isn’t really useful.
Today, I received a letter from a sister in my ward which I’ve paraphrased and shorten to keep her anonymity.
Thigh: 23” Bicep: 10” Calf: 14”
N. Nicknames: Apes!
Healthy Living!
Now it’s his turn. He steps on, says he can’t believe it (his is way down too), steps off, moves the scale cause he thinks a different reading will happen, reweighs, same result, steps off, repeats 2-3 times, same result all the time. But he is not a believer! He is in denial! Oh well, I’m not going to fill my head with doubts! I told him to think positive, so finally by the end of the day, as we walked down to the beach to enjoy sunset, he smiled sheepishly and said “I feel skinny, I feel fit!” maybe, just maybe, he is starting to believe that it’s finally happening!
You all know how I love my quilting books don`t you? Well this book has been in my amazon wishlist since I first saw that quilt on the front cover. It`s full of designs for bright modern and graphic quilts using solids.
I pondered these questions with my friends, and we all kind of agreed scandalous tops are a right of passage, we did it. Now it’s her turn for better or for worse.
Dave Solomon
“I will do anything to get my darling Elizabeth out of the hands of that notorious outlaw.” Grayson assumed a distressed demeanor. “My fiancée must be rescued. I will not rest until Valderas hangs.”
Second, God is hope. Hope can be defined as desiring something with a confident expectation of its fulfillment. In Psalm 62:5-6 we read, “Find rest, O my soul, in God alone; my hope comes from Him. He alone is my rock and my salvation; He is my fortress, I will not be shaken.” Proverbs 13:12 reads, “Hope deferred makes the heart sick, but a longing fulfilled is a tree of life.” Isaiah 40:31 famously says, “Those who hope in the Lord will renew their strength. They will soar on wings like eagles; they will run and not grow weary, they will walk and not be faint.” Romans 5:1-5 states:
1 cup lemon juice
7. Through accomplishing your dreams you will come to appreciate the experience of failure and know that failure is just part of success and that it wasn’t really all that bad as it was all worth it in the end.
Ask someone who is borderline about abandonment issues or problems with romantic relationships and IF they aren’t in a rage you’ll probably get a clear, insightful assessment of the issues; similar to what I wrote above. In fact, plenty of people with BPD can and do hold down jobs and live their life with the “normal” mask intact. But inside, they feel alien to this world and most of the time dwell in emotional turmoil. There’s an unofficial term called: The Quiet Borderline. It should have it’s own place in the DSM-V.
- I say: But he’s on Faber’s team not Cruz’s.
7 – There was (for real) a time when i only had blue color in my wardrobe. I had lots of blue t-shirts.
No place in the world that can compare
I’ve been visiting this place for books since before I can remember, but even today looking at the shelves of books interspersed with the tall Corinthian-topped pillars I can still remember feeling very small standing in the quiet of the big room and thinking it was the grandest place that could ever exist.
A roller coaster ride
I met Jacob, another American and the only other person staying at the hotel the afternoon I arrived. We hung out the next few days. It was great to have someone to see the sites with. The churches are split into two groups, North and South. It costs about $25 to see them, and if you want a guide, it's another $20! Such high prices in such a poor country, with very few people seeing that money. I went with Jacob and his guide to see the Southern churches- which was nice, because when I walked around the Northern churches alone, I had no idea which church I was looking at.
At the ripe old age of 32 and 28, we had found ourselves in each other only three months earlier. Two months later (April 15), we married in front of friends and family. It was the best Valentine's ever.
“The Crooked Kinfolk,” the legend on the side of one caravan declares. Others go on to describe the fantastic acts and attractions to be found within. All the Kinfolk seem clustered on the side of the road, murmuring and showing grave concern as the adventurers pass.
As we were watching the Threshers we were keeping tabs on the IronPigs on our cellphones. Like the big team the Pigs have been having trouble scoring runs. Finally manager Ryne Sandberg put Erik Kratz into the lineup as the DH when Tuffy Gosewisch is catching. It paid off big last night. Kratz hit a two run homer that provided the insurance runs in the 6-4 win over the Scranton Wilkes-Barre Yankees. New closer Jake Diekman pitched out of a jam with runners on third and second with no outs in the ninth for his third save of the season. This is the first time the tall, lean, lefty is closing in his career. After two more strike outs last night, Jake now has struck out 14 in 9.2 innings in eight games giving up only one earned run. I got a kick out of ESPN.Com’s Buster Olney posting today that at the major league level Toronto Blue Jays Luis Perez is the best left-handed reliever in the majors with 14 strike outs in 12.2 score less innings. That must mean Diekman is the best left-handed reliever in the minor leagues with his numbers.
Then I'm quickly reminded of "that Thanksgiving"
nearby for fish, swimming, peace, enjoyment… in the rustic outback are meadows of fresh wild herbs that would be harvested for
Whenever a user needs to complete a set of activities to submit information via a software application, wizard is used. Whether it’s applying for an online job, filing taxes or purchasing items online, wizard is used. The most important elements of a wizard are:
SINGAPORE (Dow Jones)–Singapore’s former prime minister Lee Kuan Yew said Saturday that the city-state’s economy remains supported by the rapid growth in China and India despite economic troubles in the US and Europe, local media reported. …
The challenge is open until Sunday 20 November at 12noon GMT and any entries that do not follow our challenge rules will not be eligible for any prizes so please read them carefully!
For over a year, the Habitat Club at Ramona High School has been advocating on their campus for Habitat for Humanity’s mission of eliminating substandard housing and volunteering their time on Habitat projects. The students have shown a major commitment to Habitat’s cause especially when called upon to help thank one of Habitat’s biggest donor’s, Valspar. The students assembled on their campus football field to spell out Thank You on behalf of the homeowners who were helped by Valspar’s paint donation.
Much as I abhor his cynicism, it’s possible that he’s right. The mayor looks like a burly ex-wrestler who could knock out a grizzly bear’s teeth with his bald head. Men like that are renowned for their prodigious sexual appetites. Maybe he'll go to the love supper himself, making toasts and acting like the star of the show, while his aides invite the best-looking fillies to a slumber party at the mayoral mansion. There’s no shortage of women who’d rather be the concubine of the bulldog than the wife of the poodle.
That you may reap the intended profit for your soul, you must prepare yourself daily for hearing Mass, as if if you were to communicate; that is, with as great purity as you can; and beg our Lord, who instituted this great Sacrifice, to renew the memory of his death and passion, and the efficacy fo it, to grant you the grace, not only to assist at it, but also to partake of this divine mystery according to his merciful designs.
Avril xx
Well if you know your stereotypes well enough you could tell at a glance what kind of character they have… It’s not too hard really. If it’s not that obvious to you I’ll state it out. Yuela’s the one with dark hair and wielding a sword, she’s the kuudere kind. Emelita’s the pink haired loli, boisterous and full of energy. Serawi’s the… Well the elf with the assets, she has got the part of the motherly character.
The more I learn about the way we manufacture food, the harder 'diet food' becomes.
And sadly, as a gay woman, the question of whether or not I’ll have to stay in the closet to do that job remains. There’s a lot of talk about Don’t Ask, Don’t Tell lately…but what about those jobs that DO have a, “don’t ask don’t tell,” type of ruling going on without it being supported by the state?
Waste Land faces these dilemmas as Muniz does, and the outcome is worth observing. This is a rich documentary, exquisitely structured and emotionally penetrating. The character to watch, however, is Muniz. The moral ambiguities he faces as he realizes his ambitious work face anyone trying to effect a change inside of a large problem. The outcome is not always uplifting. This film has the admirable courage to show this tough side of giving back.
Dig That Groove Baby 4:17
» 11/29 – Los Angeles, CA @ Staples Center
link back to share what you do with us !
Pokertracker Video 2
1 cup instant mashed potato flakes
Somyot was arrested April 30, 2011 at the immigration checkpoint at Sa Kaew, while he was returning from Cambodia with a red-shirt tour group. He was charged with lèse majesté for two articles published in the Voice of Taksin magazine for which he was the editor.
Lawns: It is still a great time to apply a Winterizer fertilizer to the lawn. This fertilizer will help keep your cool season turf greener, even in the coldest part of the year.
Then Boyfriend reminded me that Google tracks all of his emails because he works in a Government lab so I sent him an email that said "furry penis, REDRUM, sphaetergøten!" And Boyfriend was like "WTF?" and I said "I'm trying to throw Google off your trail." And Boyfriend was all "I don't think it works like that." I honestly don't know how he hasn't been kidnapped by the government yet.
You can find information on Twig here: www.twigthefairy.com/
It’s amazing! People of all ages and fitness levels can benefit from this device. In a quick summary I can convey that it is a therapeutic whole body massager and exerciser that blends the ancient arts with modern technology for a unique massage experience, including helping your body eliminate toxins.
Continue cooking it all on high heat until rice is heated through and veggies are cooked.
When shadows fall, I’ll raise the sun
raisins (ditto)
I've learned my lesson, I'll make sure to see a midwife in between
Every friend was able to attend the 'friend party'!!! Kaitlyn was thrilled and had a wonderful time. Her friends are very sweet and displayed wonderful manners throughout the afternoon. Kaitlyn's friends; Adi, Ruby, Halle, Kayla, Rebecca, Talitha, Allie, Joely, Lexi and of course Sis
Donna Hay Seasons is a wonderful option for tasty, easy to make food, plus the styling is inspirational. It takes you through recipes suitable for each season, with ingredients that are around at that time of year. Oh, and in case you’re not familiar with the benefits of eating food in season, it comes down to freshness, price and taste. Foods that are in season are always fresher (as they haven’t been frozen for months), cheaper (as they haven’t been shipped in from overseas and there’s an abundance in terms of supply) and of course, they taste nicer, because they’re fresh. Yum.
The Happy Times (Gone Bad) Homeowners Association
I told you about it last month over facebook. I wasn’t going to tell you, but I kept having dreams of how relieved you were and it pissed me off. I told you about my dream and you said you would be relieved if that ever happened and kept saying you didn’t think you could have kids because of a low sperm count. So I told you. And nothing was really said. You didn’t care. We haven’t talked since. I guess it’s for the best since I’m about to move in with my ex whom I’m back with. I still miss you sometimes, but not as much. He takes away the pain and fills my heart with love and joy. I’m still sad about the baby, fetus, whatever you want to consider what our love produced, but it’s better this way. I want the father of my children to actually want them in the first place. I know what it’s like first hand to have a shitty father because he never really wanted you. I don’t wish that upon my kids. I don’t know what kind of father you would have been, but you’re great with your little brothers so maybe you’d be a great one. I don’t know.
Come back web 1.0, all is forgiven!
Now, so he’s in the brig and I’m in the brig because of my negative. We both want out, because let’s face it — being in the brig is BORING. You can help minimally with crises from the brig, and you kind of just sit there.
What I like most about these fries is how crispy they turned out! I typically hesitate buying frozen fries because I've yet to find ones that aren't soggy. Although I baked these in the oven, they tasted like they were straight from the deep fryer!
(12) Check out Sleeping Beauty’s Christmas château
Bake at 35oºF for about 10-13 minutes until the edges gets golden brown and the top cracks up like crazy.
In politics, most people talk about the difficulties of breaking through glass ceilings but we’ve turned the metaphor on its head by showing that, despite the very thin ice we’re skating on, we are on the brink of achieving an historic breakthrough.
The more and more that I think about it, this idea of sin all boils down to selfishness. There isn’t a single sin in my life (and I would argue anyone’s life) that can’t be summed up by my selfishness. Selfishness looks out for one thing and one thing only: my own interest. Selfishness makes a person ugly and unappealing inside and out. Selfishness leaves a person empty, alone and hopeless, yet in the midst of it, selfishness promises instant gratification previously unknown.
All last week was what EACH DAY seemed to have felt like! However, thank God for a brand NEW DAY! I know that I am not alone but it just felt “good to vent” for my own general principles……
Yes, we visited the Heart of Darkness, AKA "The Happiest Place on Earth," over the long weekend. And here are some (but not all) of the gory details.
Coriolis Socks by Cat Bordhi
I wanted to frost these a little so I touched the petal edges with white frosty stickles and then put a gem in the centre of each. I think they would look lovely with pastel shades of stickles on the petal edges too.
Case In Point: A friend stopped me at a park the other day and mentioned how awfully hard it must be having three little ones and how my blog made it seem that I was just really struggling with the whole thing. My life was, it seemed, impossible.
Lara Scott
The strangely wrinkled seedling of the morning glory, playing host to a tiny bug. Is that an aphid? And is my google source right in telling me that the ants have moved in to eat the aphids, massacring our green leaves along with them?
When an order is placed using a credit card as payment, the Apple Store will perform an automated check to confirm that the address information matches what is on file with the card-issuing bank. It is less likely that an automated response will be received from an international bank than from a U.S. bank. If a response is received and indicates that some of the information does not match, we must contact the bank for verification. If the card-issuing bank is outside the U.S., the secondary verification is not possible, and we cannot proceed with the order. For this reason, Apple strongly recommends that you use only credit cards issued within the U.S. or Canada.
It makes me crazy that the kid is so smart, but just couldn't care less about school and grades. He reminds me of someone.... (Umm, sorry again for making you guys nuts, Mom and Dad.)
Interpretation: Once I get the hang of something, I can decide how far to bend/break the rules.
Is where we have landed for the night tonight. We are at a lovely little park. The puppies are playing with all of their toys. They have ridden for many hours today. We still are in awe at how well they have adjusted to this lifestyle. Life is good and so is the "Cab" I am having as I write.
He said, I swear, I can’t bear to look at you.
So we took him home with us. I had done some reading about introducing a new cat, so we set him up in our bedroom last night. He stayed under the bed until about 4 in the morning, but now he's out and about like he's always lived here. Mr. Whiskers is completely intimidated yet strangely mesmerized by him. He's been following him around, but hiding, just peeking his head around corners to check him out. Kirby just ignores him for now.
I mostly kitbashed, there was very minimal fabrication and sculpting. This was a great proof of concept for me, so if/when I get the 40k bug again I plan to build a unit for myself sometime. They are a bit pricey though, so I expect to do a lot more scratchbuilding to save on material costs.
In the meantime, let's start tapping into our own deposits right here in North America and tell the OPEC assholes to go to hell.
Well. Long, long, long hiatus but UBF is back. More accurately, I'm rebuilding what I (foolishly, sure) deleted three years ago when I changed jobs, moved and failed to keep my promise to update UBF when time allowed. Forgive.
Bloggers Bake for Hope is a virtual bake sale. Bloggers will donate their time, ingredients, and shipping costs so there are no expenses associated with this virtual bake sale. All proceeds from the bake sale will be sent to the Massachusetts Komen for the Cure.
